Texas statutes.
HUMAN RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 10. JUVENILE BOARDS, JUVENILE PROBATION DEPARTMENTS, AND FAMILY SERVICES OFFICES

SUBTITLE B. JUVENILE BOARDS AND FAMILY SERVICES OFFICES

CHAPTER 152. JUVENILE BOARDS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 152.0001. APPLICATION OF SUBCHAPTER. (a) This subchapter applies to each juvenile board created under this chapter. If a provision of this subchapter conflicts with a specific provision for a particular juvenile board, the specific provision controls.

(b) A statement in this chapter that a general provision of this subchapter does not apply to a specific juvenile board does not affect the application of other laws on the same subject that may affect the board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.00011. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "post-adjudication secure correctional facility" means a facility operated by or under contract with a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department under Section 152.0016.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 854 (S.B. 1149), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 152.0002. BOARD MEETINGS. The juvenile board shall hold regular quarterly meetings on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0003. COMPENSATION. The compensation authorized under this chapter for a judge serving on a juvenile board is in addition to all other compensation provided or allowed by law for a judge. Notwithstanding any other law, the combined salary from all state and local sources of a district judge serving on a juvenile board may not exceed an amount that is $5,000 less than the salary provided by the state for a justice of a court of appeals other than the chief justice.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 11), Sec. 7, eff. December 1, 2005.

Sec. 152.0004. GENERAL EXPENSES. The commissioners court shall pay the salaries of juvenile probation personnel and other expenses certified as necessary by the juvenile board chairman from the general funds of the county.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0005. EXPENSES OF BOARD MEMBERS AND JUVENILE COURT. (a) The commissioners court shall reimburse a juvenile board member for the member's reasonable and necessary job-related expenses. Reimbursable expenses include travel, lodging, training, and educational activities.

(b) The commissioners court shall reimburse each juvenile court judge for the judge's actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending seminars and other educational or instructional meetings relating to juvenile matters.

(c) All expenses are paid from the general fund or any other fund of the county.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0006. FISCAL OFFICER. The juvenile board shall designate a person as the board's fiscal officer.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0007. DUTIES. (a) The juvenile board shall:

(1) establish a juvenile probation department and employ a chief probation officer who meets the standards set by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department; and

(2) adopt a budget and establish policies, including financial policies, for juvenile services within the jurisdiction of the board.

(b) The board may establish guidelines for the initial assessment of a child by the juvenile probation department. The guidelines shall provide a means for assessing a child's mental health status, family background, and level of education. The guidelines shall assist the probation department in determining whether a comprehensive psychological evaluation of the child should be conducted. The board shall require that probation department personnel use assessment information compiled by the child's school, if the information is available, before conducting a comprehensive psychological evaluation of the child. The board may adopt all or part of the Texas Juvenile Justice Department's minimum standards for assessment under Section 221.002 in complying with this subsection.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 73, eff. Jan. 1, 1996; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 64, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 3.016, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 126, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 152.0008. PERSONNEL. (a) The chief juvenile probation officer may, within the budget adopted by the board, employ:

(1) assistant officers who meet the standards set by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department; and

(2) other necessary personnel.

(b) Juvenile probation officers serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 65, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 127, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 152.0009. TRANSPORTATION. (a) This section applies only in a county with a population of 190,000 or less.

(b) The commissioners court may provide each juvenile probation officer with an automobile for use on official business and provide an allowance for operating the automobile.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0010. ADVISORY COUNCIL. (a) A juvenile board may appoint an advisory council consisting of the number of citizen members determined appropriate by the board. To the extent available in the county, the advisory council may include:

(1) a prosecuting attorney as defined by Section 51.02, Family Code;

(2) a mental health professional;

(3) a medical health professional; and

(4) a representative of the education community.

(b) Council members serve terms as specified by the board.

(c) The juvenile board shall fill any vacancies on the advisory council.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 74, eff. Jan. 1, 1996; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 66, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 152.0011. LOCAL YOUTH BOOT CAMPS; CONTRACTS WITH PRIVATE VENDORS. (a) The juvenile board or local juvenile probation department may establish a youth boot camp and employ necessary personnel to operate the camp.

(b) The juvenile board or local juvenile probation department may contract with a private vendor for the financing, construction, operation, maintenance, or management of a youth boot camp.

(c) If a juvenile board or its designee determines that a child is not complying with the rules of conduct promulgated by the board or is medically or psychologically unsuitable for the program, the board shall terminate the child's participation in the program and request the sentencing court to reassume custody of the child.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 75, eff. Jan. 1, 1996.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 3.017, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 152.0012. BUDGET. The juvenile board shall prepare a budget for the juvenile probation department and the other facilities and programs under the jurisdiction of the juvenile board. The commissioners court shall review and consider only the amount of county funds derived from county taxes, fees, and other county sources in the budget. The commissioners court may not review any part of the budget derived from state funds.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 262, Sec. 76, eff. Jan. 1, 1996.

Sec. 152.0013. IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY. (a) A member of a juvenile board is not liable for damages arising from an act or omission committed while performing duties as a board member.

(b) This section does not apply if the act or omission is:

(1) reckless or intentional;

(2) done wilfully, wantonly, or with gross negligence; or

(3) done with conscious indifference or reckless disregard for the safety of others.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1297, Sec. 67, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 152.0014. INDEMNIFICATION BY STATE. The state shall indemnify a juvenile board member in the same manner and under the same conditions that it indemnifies an officer of a state agency under Chapter 104, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 709, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Human Resources Code Sec. 152.013 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(101), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 152.00145. DIVERSION AND DETENTION POLICY FOR CERTAIN JUVENILES. A juvenile board shall establish policies that prioritize:

(1) the diversion of children younger than 12 years of age from referral to a prosecuting attorney under Chapter 53, Family Code; and

(2) the limitation of detention of children younger than 12 years of age to circumstances of last resort.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 698 (H.B. 1204), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 152.0015. PRETRIAL DETENTION POLICY FOR CERTAIN JUVENILES. A juvenile board shall establish a policy that specifies whether a person who has been transferred for criminal prosecution under Section 54.02, Family Code, and is younger than 17 years of age may be detained in a juvenile facility pending trial as provided by Section 51.12, Family Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1087 (S.B. 1209), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 152.00161. TERMINATION OF CONTROL. (a) Except as provided by Subsections (b) and (c), if a person is committed to a post-adjudication secure correctional facility under a determinate sentence under Section 54.04011(c)(2), Family Code, the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department may not discharge the person from custody.

(b) The juvenile board or local juvenile probation department shall discharge without a court hearing a person committed to the department for a determinate sentence under Section 54.04011(c)(2), Family Code, who has not been transferred to the Texas Department of Criminal Justice under a court order on the date that the time spent by the person in detention in connection with the committing case plus the time spent in the custody of the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department under the order of commitment equals the period of the sentence.

(c) The juvenile board or local juvenile probation department shall transfer to the Texas Department of Criminal Justice a person who is the subject of an order under Section 152.0016(j) transferring the person to the custody of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for the completion of the person's sentence.

(d) Except as provided by Subsection (e), the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department shall discharge from its custody a person not already discharged on the person's 19th birthday.

(e) The juvenile board or local juvenile probation department shall transfer a person who has been sentenced under a determinate sentence to commitment under Section 54.04011(c)(2), Family Code, or who has been returned to the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department under Section 54.11(i)(1), Family Code, to the custody of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice on the person's 19th birthday, if the person has not already been discharged or transferred, to serve the remainder of the person's sentence on parole as provided by Section 508.156, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 854 (S.B. 1149), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 152.00162. DETERMINATE SENTENCE PAROLE. (a) Not later than the 90th day before the date the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department transfers a person to the custody of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for release on parole supervision under Section 152.0016(g) or 152.00161(e), the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department shall submit to the Texas Department of Criminal Justice all pertinent information relating to the person, including:

(1) the juvenile court judgment;

(2) the circumstances of the person's offense;

(3) the person's previous social history and juvenile court records;

(4) the person's physical and mental health record;

(5) a record of the person's conduct, employment history, and attitude while committed to the department;

(6) a record of the sentence time served by the person at the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department as a result of a commitment under Section 54.04011(c)(2), Family Code, and in a juvenile detention facility in connection with the conduct for which the person was adjudicated; and

(7) any written comments or information provided by the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department, local officials, family members of the person, victims of the offense, or the general public.

(b) The juvenile board or local juvenile probation department shall provide instruction for parole officers of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice relating to juvenile programs provided by the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department. The juvenile boards and local juvenile probation departments and the Texas Department of Criminal Justice shall enter into a memorandum of understanding relating to the administration of this subsection.

(c) The Texas Department of Criminal Justice shall grant credit for sentence time served by a person in the custody of a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department and in a juvenile detention facility, as recorded by the board or department under Subsection (a)(6), in computing the person's eligibility for parole and discharge from the Texas Department of Criminal Justice.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 854 (S.B. 1149), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 152.00163. CHILD WITH MENTAL ILLNESS OR INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY. (a) A juvenile board or local juvenile probation department shall accept a child with a mental illness or an intellectual disability who is committed to the custody of the board or department.

(b) Unless a child is committed to the custody of a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department under a determinate sentence under Section 54.04011(c)(2), Family Code, the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department shall discharge a child with a mental illness or an intellectual disability from its custody if:

(1) the child has completed the minimum length of stay for the child's committing offense; and

(2) the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department determines that the child is unable to progress in the rehabilitation programs provided by the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department because of the child's mental illness or intellectual disability.

(c) If a child who is discharged from the custody of a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department under Subsection (b) as a result of mental illness is not receiving court-ordered mental health services, the child's discharge is effective on the earlier of:

(1) the date the court enters an order regarding an application for mental health services filed under Section 152.00164(b); or

(2) the 30th day after the date the application is filed.

(d) If a child who is discharged from the custody of a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department under Subsection (b) as a result of mental illness is receiving court-ordered mental health services, the child's discharge is effective immediately. If the child is receiving mental health services outside the child's home county, the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department shall notify the mental health authority located in that county of the discharge not later than the 30th day after the date that the child's discharge is effective.

(e) If a child who is discharged from the custody of a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department under Subsection (b) as a result of an intellectual disability is not receiving intellectual disability services, the child's discharge is effective on the 30th day after the date that the referral is made under Section 152.00164(c).

(f) If a child who is discharged from the custody of a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department under Subsection (b) as a result of an intellectual disability is receiving intellectual disability services, the child's discharge is effective immediately.

(g) If a child with a mental illness or an intellectual disability is discharged from the custody of a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department under Subsection (b), the child is eligible to receive continuity of care services from the Texas Correctional Office on Offenders with Medical or Mental Impairments under Chapter 614, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 854 (S.B. 1149), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 152.00164. EXAMINATION BEFORE DISCHARGE. (a) A juvenile board or local juvenile probation department shall establish a system that identifies children with mental illnesses or intellectual disabilities who are in the custody of the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department.

(b) Before a child who is identified as having a mental illness is discharged from the custody of the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department under Section 152.00163(b), the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department shall arrange for a psychiatrist to examine the child. The juvenile board or local juvenile probation department shall refer a child requiring outpatient psychiatric treatment to the appropriate mental health authority. For a child requiring inpatient psychiatric treatment, the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department shall file a sworn application for court-ordered mental health services, as provided in Subchapter C, Chapter 574, Health and Safety Code, if:

(1) the child is not receiving court-ordered mental health services; and

(2) the psychiatrist who examined the child determines that the child has a mental illness and the child meets at least one of the criteria listed in Section 574.034 or 574.0345, Health and Safety Code.

(c) Before a child who is identified as having an intellectual disability under Chapter 593, Health and Safety Code, is discharged from the custody of a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department under Section 152.00163(b), the department shall refer the child for intellectual disability services if the child is not receiving intellectual disability services.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 854 (S.B. 1149), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 582 (S.B. 362), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 152.00165. TRANSFER OF CERTAIN CHILDREN SERVING DETERMINATE SENTENCES FOR MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES. (a) A juvenile board or local juvenile probation department may petition the juvenile court that entered the order of commitment for a child for the initiation of mental health commitment proceedings if the child is committed to the custody of the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department under a determinate sentence under Section 54.04011(c)(2), Family Code.

(b) A petition made by a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department shall be treated as a motion under Section 55.11, Family Code, and the juvenile court shall proceed in accordance with Subchapter B, Chapter 55, Family Code.

(c) A juvenile board or local juvenile probation department shall cooperate with the juvenile court in any proceeding under this section.

(d) The juvenile court shall credit to the term of the child's commitment to a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department any time the child is committed to an inpatient mental health facility.

(e) A child committed to an inpatient mental health facility as a result of a petition filed under this section may not be released from the facility on a pass or furlough.

(f) If the term of an order committing a child to an inpatient mental health facility is scheduled to expire before the end of the child's sentence and another order committing the child to an inpatient mental health facility is not scheduled to be entered, the inpatient mental health facility shall notify the juvenile court that entered the order of commitment committing the child to a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department. The juvenile court may transfer the child to the custody of the juvenile board or local juvenile probation department, transfer the child to the Texas Department of Criminal Justice, or release the child under supervision, as appropriate.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 854 (S.B. 1149), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 152.0017. TRAFFICKED PERSONS PROGRAM. (a) A juvenile board may establish a trafficked persons program under this section for the assistance, treatment, and rehabilitation of children who:

(1) are alleged to have engaged in or adjudicated as having engaged in delinquent conduct or conduct indicating a need for supervision;

(2) may be victims of an offense of trafficking of persons as defined by Article 56B.003, Code of Criminal Procedure; and

(3) have been referred to the program by the Child Sex Trafficking Prevention Unit established under Section 772.0062, Government Code, or the governor's program for victims of child sex trafficking established under Section 772.0063, Government Code.

(b) A program established under this section must:

(1) if applicable, allow for the integration of services available to a child pursuant to proceedings under Title 3, Family Code, and Subtitle E, Title 5, Family Code;

(2) if applicable, allow for the referral to a facility that can address issues associated with human trafficking; and

(3) require a child participating in the program to periodically appear in court for monitoring and compliance purposes.

(c) A facility qualified to provide one or more services under this section may apply for a grant under Section 50.0155, Health and Safety Code, only for the purposes of providing constitutionally secure shelter and research-based treatment services to human trafficking victims.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 186 (S.B. 92), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2013.

Redesignated from Human Resources Code, Section 152.0016 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(36), eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 704 (H.B. 2633), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. CREATION OF JUVENILE BOARD IN CERTAIN COUNTIES

Sec. 152.0031. APPLICATION OF SUBCHAPTER. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, this subchapter does not apply to a county that is served by a juvenile board created under Subchapter C or D.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 198 (S.B. 1886), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2011.

Sec. 152.0032. COMPOSITION OF JUVENILE BOARD. (a) The juvenile board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in the county, and the judges of any statutory courts designated as a juvenile court in the county.

(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), the juvenile board of Jim Wells County is composed of the judges of the county and district courts in the county. The board must have not fewer than three nor more than five members. The judges of the county and district courts in the county may appoint an appropriate number of public members to serve on the board if necessary to satisfy this requirement. Notwithstanding Section 152.0034(b), a public member serves without compensation. The chairman of the board shall determine the number of public members to be appointed to the board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 152.0033. CHAIRMAN. The juvenile board shall select one of its members to act as chairman.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0034. COMPENSATION OF BOARD MEMBERS. (a) Service on a juvenile board by a judge is an additional duty of office.

(b) The commissioners court may reasonably compensate each member of the juvenile board for the member's additional duties.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0035. EXPENSES OF BOARD MEMBERS. The county shall reimburse a juvenile board member for the member's actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing official duties on the board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0036. JOINT OPERATION. (a) The juvenile boards of two or more counties that are adjacent to or in close proximity to each other may agree to operate together.

(b) Juvenile boards operating together may appoint one fiscal officer to receive and disburse funds for the boards.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0037. FUNDS. (a) The board may accept state aid and grants or gifts from other political subdivisions of the state or associations for the sole purpose of financing adequate and effective probation programs.

(b) A municipality may grant and allocate money to the county government or to the juvenile board to support and maintain juvenile programs if the municipality's governing body approves the expenditure.

(c) Funds received under this section shall be administered and kept separately from other county funds.

(d) This subchapter does not prohibit a program of local enrichment of juvenile services funded by any source.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0038. SALARIES AND EXPENSES. (a) The juvenile board shall pay the salaries of juvenile probation department personnel and other expenses required to provide adequate services to children from the juvenile board fund to the extent of the state aid received in the fund.

(b) The county shall pay other salaries and expenses essential to provide adequate services to children in an amount set by the juvenile board with the advice and consent of the county commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0039. TRANSPORTATION. The juvenile board shall provide the juvenile probation officers with transportation or an automobile allowance for use of a personal automobile on official business.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0040. APPLICATION OF GENERAL JUVENILE BOARD PROVISIONS. Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, and 152.0009 do not apply to a juvenile board operating under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER C. COUNTY JUVENILE BOARD IN COUNTIES WITH A FAMILY DISTRICT COURT

Sec. 152.0051. COMPOSITION OF JUVENILE BOARD. The juvenile board of a county that has a family district court is composed of:

(1) the county judge;

(2) the judge of each family district court;

(3) the judge of each other district court in the county; and

(4) the judge of each other court in the county that has jurisdiction over juvenile matters.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0052. CHAIRMAN. The members of the juvenile board shall select a family district court judge to serve as chairman of the board unless the county has only one family district court judge.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0053. COMPENSATION. The commissioners court may compensate each juvenile board member for the member's duties performed on the juvenile board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0054. PROVISION OF PHYSICAL FACILITIES. The commissioners court shall provide the physical facilities necessary to operate the juvenile board on the board's recommendation.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0055. EFFECT ON CERTAIN JUVENILE BOARDS. This subchapter does not affect the composition or organization of a juvenile board existing on September 1, 1977.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER D. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO SPECIFIC COUNTIES

Sec. 152.0071. ANDERSON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Anderson County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Anderson County, and the criminal district attorney of Anderson County. The commissioners court by order may add to the board the judge of the county court at law in Anderson County.

(b) The judge of the juvenile court is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $50 nor more than $250 a month for the added duties imposed on the members.

(d) The commissioners court shall pay the additional compensation and expenses of the juvenile probation officer from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Anderson County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0081. ANDREWS COUNTY. (a) The Andrews County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Andrews County, and the county attorney of Andrews County.

(b) The judge of the juvenile court is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board chairman additional compensation of $1,200 for the added duties imposed on the chairman. The commissioners court may pay the other members of the board additional compensation of not more than $1,200. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Andrews County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0091. ANGELINA COUNTY. (a) The Angelina County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the judges of the statutory county courts, and the district judges in Angelina County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation in an amount determined by the commissioners court for the added duties imposed on the members. The combined yearly salary from state and county sources received by each judge may not exceed an amount equal to $1,000 less than the combined yearly salary from state and county sources received by each justice of the court of appeals of the court of appeals district in which Angelina County is located. The additional compensation is paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Angelina County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0101. ARANSAS COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Aransas County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Aransas County, and the judge of the county court at law.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation may not be lower than the amount paid to the judges on September 1, 1981.

(c) The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Aransas County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 998, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 152.0131. ATASCOSA COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Atascosa County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Atascosa County, and the judge of the County Court at Law of Atascosa County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $4,800 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Atascosa County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 6.03, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 152.0141. AUSTIN COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Austin County is composed of the county judge, the judges of the statutory county courts, and a judge of a district court in Austin County as determined by the commissioners court.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation of not more than $1,200 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Austin County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0151. BAILEY COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Bailey and Parmer counties is composed of the county judge, the district judges in the counties, and the judge of each statutory court designated as a juvenile court in the counties.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman.

(c) The commissioners courts of the counties shall pay the members of the juvenile board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $1,800, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the counties. The counties shall apportion and pay the salary according to the ratio used to pay the expenses of the 287th Judicial District.

(d) The counties shall apportion and pay the juvenile board costs, other than the judges' salaries, according to the ratio used to pay the expenses of the 287th Judicial District, unless the counties agree to use a different method of allocating costs.

(e) The chief juvenile probation officer may set the salaries and allowances of juvenile probation personnel with the approval of the board.

(f) Section 152.0005(b) does not apply to the juvenile board in Bailey and Parmer counties.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0161. BANDERA COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Bandera County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Bandera County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $600 nor more than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Bandera County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0181. BAYLOR COUNTY. (a) Baylor County is included in the 50th Judicial District Juvenile Board. The juvenile board is composed of the judge of the 50th Judicial District and the county judge of each county in the judicial district. The juvenile court judge may designate two public members to serve on the board without compensation and for a period determined by the juvenile court judge.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each calendar year.

(c) The commissioners courts of the counties shall pay the judges who are members of the juvenile board additional annual compensation of not more than $6,000 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the counties.

(d) If approved by the juvenile board, the commissioners court shall reimburse the juvenile court judge for the judge's actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending seminars and other educational or instructional meetings related to juvenile problems. The counties shall prorate the expenses allowed for the members of the juvenile board and for the juvenile court judge.

(e) The commissioners courts shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries of the juvenile probation personnel in the amount set by the juvenile board.

(f) The commissioners court shall pay the expenses of the juvenile probation officers that are certified as necessary by the juvenile board chairman from the general fund and in the amount set by the juvenile board.

(g) Sections 152.0004 and 152.0005(b) do not apply to the 50th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0191. BEE COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Bee County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Bee County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation may not be lower than the amount paid to the judges on September 1, 1981.

(c) The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Bee County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0201. BELL COUNTY. (a) The Bell County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Bell County, and the judge of each county court at law in the county.

(b) The county judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary in an amount set by the commissioners court as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Bell County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1149, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Sec. 152.0211. BEXAR COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Bexar County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Bexar County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the county judge additional annual compensation of $4,500. The county commissioners court shall pay the district judges on the board an additional annual salary of $1,500. The additional compensation paid to the county and district judges shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) The juvenile board shall hold meetings at least once every three months in accordance with board rules.

(d) The board shall keep records as required by law and board rules.

(e) A juvenile probation officer shall take the oath of office when appointed and the oath and the fact of the appointment shall be filed with the county clerk.

(f) The commissioners court shall provide the juvenile probation officers with:

(1) automobiles and their maintenance and operation expenses for use in official duties; or

(2) an automobile allowance for the use of a personal automobile on official business in the amount determined to be necessary by the commissioners court.

(g) The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation personnel.

(h) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Bexar County.

(i) The board may apply for, accept, hold in trust, spend, and otherwise use a gift, grant, or donation of land or money or other personal property from a governmental entity, corporation, individual, or other source for the benefit of the juvenile justice system.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1059 (H.B. 4700), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 152.0212. BEXAR COUNTY INSTITUTIONS. (a) The juvenile board of Bexar County shall appoint a person to supervise the county facilities under the jurisdiction of the juvenile board. The supervisor may be the county probation officer. The supervisor shall direct the policies and conduct of each institution.

(b) The juvenile board shall also appoint the head of each facility. The facility head may hire employees that the juvenile board determines are necessary.

(c) The facilities supervisor or employees under the supervisor's control shall supervise each child committed to a county institution until the child becomes of age. The supervisor or employees shall submit periodic reports to the juvenile board as required for the board's approval or action.

(d) The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to operate each institution.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0213. COLLECTION AND DISBURSEMENT OF SUPPORT PAYMENTS IN BEXAR COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Bexar County may designate the district clerk or the juvenile probation officer to collect and disburse court-ordered child or spousal support payments that are required by court order to be made to the county. The person designated to receive the payments shall disburse the payments in the manner the court believes to be in the best interest of the spouse or child.

(b) If the juvenile board designates the juvenile probation officer to receive the payments, the officer shall work in the court as an officer of the court. The officer shall obtain a surety bond in an amount determined by the commissioners court from a solvent surety company authorized to make the bonds in this state and approved by the commissioners court. The bond shall be conditioned on the faithful performance of the officer's duties and on the proper accounting of the money entrusted to the officer. The county shall pay the premium for the bond from the general fund of the county.

(c) The juvenile officer shall keep an accurate and complete record of money received and disbursed under this section. The record is open for public inspection. The county auditor shall inspect and examine the records and audit the accounts quarterly. The auditor shall report the results of the audit to the juvenile board and include any recommendations the auditor may have.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0221. BLANCO COUNTY. (a) The Blanco County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Blanco County.

(b) The judge of the 33rd District Court is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $1,200 as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Blanco County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 152.0231. BORDEN COUNTY. (a) Borden County is included in the 132nd Judicial District Juvenile Board. The juvenile board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Borden and Scurry counties.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman.

(c) The commissioners courts of the counties shall pay the members of the juvenile board annual supplemental compensation of $2,400 from the general fund or any other available fund of the counties.

(d) The juvenile board shall hold regular meetings on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(e) The commissioners courts may reimburse a juvenile board member for the member's reasonable and necessary job-related expenses. Reimbursable expenses include travel, lodging, training, and educational activities.

(f) The juvenile board shall pay the salaries of juvenile probation personnel and other expenses the chairman certifies as essential to provide services to children from the juvenile board fund to the extent of the state aid received in the fund.

(g) The juvenile board shall designate the treasurer or auditor of Borden County or Scurry County to serve as the board's fiscal officer.

(h) The juvenile board shall appoint an advisory council composed of one person from each county.

(i) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005(a) and (b), 152.0006, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the 132nd Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0241. BOSQUE COUNTY. (a) Bosque County is included in the Bosque, Comanche, and Hamilton counties juvenile board. The juvenile board is composed of:

(1) the county judge in Bosque County;

(2) the county judge in Comanche County;

(3) the county judge in Hamilton County;

(4) the 220th Judicial District judge; and

(5) the judge of the County Court at Law of Bosque County.

(b) The 220th Judicial District judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court of Bosque County shall pay the county judge in Bosque County and the 220th Judicial District judge additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than the amount paid to a board member under this section on October 1, 1998. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Bosque County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 336, Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 239 (S.B. 2229), Sec. 2, eff. October 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1103 (H.B. 4833), Sec. 10(b), eff. October 1, 2009.

Sec. 152.0251. BOWIE COUNTY. (a) The Bowie County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges, and the judge of each statutory county court in Bowie County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The county commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200. The additional compensation is for the added duties imposed on the members and shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the funds necessary to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation officer.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the Bowie County Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 152.0252 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 592, Sec. 2(c), eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 429, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 152.0261. BRAZORIA COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Brazoria County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Brazoria County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the board members annual additional compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Brazoria County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0262. COMPENSATION OF JUVENILE JUDGE IN BRAZORIA COUNTY. (a) The Commissioners Court of Brazoria County may pay the juvenile judge additional annual compensation of not more than $1,500 for serving as the judge of the juvenile court.

(b) The compensation is in addition to all other compensation paid or authorized to be paid to the judge who serves as the juvenile judge.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0263. BRAZORIA COUNTY CHILD SUPPORT OFFICE. (a) The judges of the district courts in Brazoria County may establish a child support office in the county juvenile office to collect and disburse child support payments that are required by court order to be made to the office. The office shall disburse the payments in the manner the court believes to be in the best interest of the parties in the case.

(b) The judges of the district courts in a county served by an office may appoint an administrator and other assistants to serve two-year terms. The administrator shall obtain a surety bond in an amount determined by the county auditor from a solvent surety company authorized to make the bonds in this state and approved by the county auditor. The bond shall be conditioned on the faithful performance of the administrator's duties and on the proper accounting of the money entrusted to the administrator. The county shall pay the premium for the bond from the general fund of the county, the child support fund, or any other available fund.

(c) The judges shall determine the duties of the administrator and assistants and set their salaries. The salaries are payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county, the child support fund, or any other available fund. The judges must approve a claim for expenses made by the administrator or an assistant or a claim for administrative expenses in operating the child support office, including a claim for payment of equipment and supplies.

(d) The office shall keep an accurate and complete record of money received and disbursed under this section. The record is open for public inspection. The county auditor or other authorized county officer or employee shall inspect and examine the records and audit the accounts quarterly. The auditor shall report the results of the audit to the judges and include any recommendations the auditor may have.

(e) The child support office may serve one or more of Fort Bend, Matagorda, and Wharton counties. If a child support office serves more than one county, the judges of the district courts in the counties shall determine the location of the office. The officers and employees of the county in which the office is located shall perform the duties prescribed by this section. The counties shall pay the salaries, bond premium, and other expenses in accordance with the ratio that the population of each county bears to the total population of all of the counties served by the office.

(f) The commissioners courts shall pay the district court judges $75 a month for performing the duties prescribed by this section. The compensation shall be paid from the general fund of the county and is in addition to any other compensation the judges receive.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0264. BRAZORIA COUNTY CHILD SUPPORT SERVICE FEE. (a) The Brazoria County child support office shall assess a monthly fee of not more than $10 for collecting and disbursing child support payments that are required by court order to be made to the office. The fee is payable annually and in advance.

(b) The payor of the support shall pay the fee unless the payor is a member of the armed services and the monthly child support payments exceed the amount the court orders the person to pay, in which case the payee shall pay the service fee for as long as the payor is a member of the armed services and the support payments exceed the amount the court orders the person to pay.

(c) The first fee payment is due on the date that the payor is ordered to begin the child support payments. If the payee must pay the fee, the first fee payment is due on the date that the payee receives the original support payment. Subsequent annual fees are due on the anniversary of the date of the original fee payment.

(d) A person who refuses or fails to pay the fee on the date due or in the amount ordered is subject to an action for contempt of court.

(e) Fees collected under this section shall be paid to the county treasurer on the last day of each calendar month. The county treasurer shall deposit the fees to the credit of the child support fund. The judges of the district courts in a county served by the office shall administer the fund, with the approval of the commissioners court, to assist in paying the salaries and expenses of the child support office.

(f) An accurate and complete record of money received under this section shall be kept. The county auditor or other authorized person shall audit the child support fund regularly. An annual report of the receipts and expenditures of the fund shall be made to the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 12.04(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 152.0271. BRAZOS COUNTY. (a) The Brazos County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Brazos County, the judge of each county court at law, and one public member appointed by the judges.

(b) The public member serves a two-year term.

(c) The county judge is the chairman of the board.

(d) The commissioners court shall pay the judges on the juvenile board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $600 nor more than $1,200. The commissioners court shall pay the public member of the board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $600. The salaries shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other fund of the county.

(e) The chief juvenile probation officer may set the salaries and allowances of juvenile probation personnel with the approval of the board.

(f) Section 152.0005(b) does not apply to the juvenile board of Brazos County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 514, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1991.

Sec. 152.0281. BREWSTER COUNTY. (a) The Brewster County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Brewster County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $3,600 as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Brewster County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0291. BRISCOE COUNTY. (a) Briscoe County is included in the 110th Judicial District Juvenile Board. The juvenile board is composed of the county judges, the district judges in Briscoe, Dickens, Floyd, and Motley counties and the judge of any juvenile court in the counties.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman.

(c) The juvenile board shall hold regular meetings on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(d) The members of the juvenile board do not receive compensation for serving on the board. The commissioners courts may reimburse a juvenile board member for the member's reasonable and necessary job-related expenses. Reimbursable expenses include travel, lodging, training, and educational activities.

(e) The juvenile board shall pay the salaries of juvenile probation personnel and other expenses the chairman certifies as essential to provide services to children from the juvenile board fund to the extent of the state aid received in the fund.

(f) The juvenile board shall designate the treasurer or auditor of Briscoe, Dickens, Floyd, or Motley County to serve as the board's fiscal officer.

(g) The juvenile board shall appoint an advisory council composed of one person from each county.

(h) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005(a), 152.0005(b), 152.0006, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the 110th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0301. BROOKS COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Brooks County is composed of the judges of the county and district courts in the county. The board must have not fewer than three nor more than five members. The judges of the county and district courts in the county may appoint an appropriate number of public members to serve on the board without compensation if necessary to satisfy this requirement. The chairman of the board shall determine the number of public members to be appointed to the board.

(b) The county judge is the chairman of the board.

(c) The board shall hold biannual meetings on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(d) Service on a juvenile board by a judge is an additional duty of office. The commissioners court shall pay the judges on the juvenile board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $6,000, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(e) The county shall reimburse a juvenile board member for the member's actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing the member's duties.

(f) The juvenile board shall ensure that the chief juvenile officer and fiscal officer:

(1) keep the financial and statistical records and submit reports to the Texas Juvenile Justice Department as prescribed by Section 221.007; and

(2) submit periodic financial and statistical reports to the county commissioners court.

(g) The chief juvenile probation officer shall appoint an appropriate number of qualified juvenile probation officers, assistants, and support personnel with the approval of the board as necessary to perform his duties. The chief juvenile probation officer and the personnel appointed under this section may be removed at any time by the appointing authority or by the juvenile board. The chief juvenile probation officer shall recommend to the juvenile board the salaries of and allowances for juvenile probation officers, assistants, and support personnel. The juvenile board shall provide the chief juvenile probation officer and his assistants with transportation or an automobile allowance for use of a personal automobile on official business.

(h) A claim for expenses from a person in the juvenile probation department must be made to the board chairman. The chairman shall certify to the fiscal officer the expenses to be paid from state funds and shall certify to the commissioners court the expenses to be paid from county funds.

(i) The chairman of the board shall certify to the commissioners court an annual request for the expenditure of county funds. The commissioners court shall act on the request in the same manner as it acts on a request from another county office.

(j) The board may accept state aid and grants and gifts from other political subdivisions of the state or associations for the purpose of financing adequate and effective juvenile programs. A municipality may grant and allocate money to the juvenile board to support and maintain effective juvenile services if the municipality's governing body approves the expenditure. Funds received under this subsection shall be administered and kept separately from other public funds. This section does not affect a program of local enrichment of juvenile services funded by a service.

(k) The juvenile board shall appoint an advisory council of not more than five persons.

(l) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0008, and 152.0009 do not apply to the juvenile board of Brooks County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 3.018, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 152.0331. BURNET COUNTY. (a) The Burnet County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Burnet County.

(b) The judge of the 33rd District Court is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $1,200 as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Burnet County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 152.0341. CALDWELL COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Caldwell County is composed of the county judge, the judges of the statutory county courts, and the judge of a judicial district in Caldwell County as determined by the commissioners court.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Caldwell County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 72, Sec. 1, eff. May 9, 1991.

Sec. 152.0351. CALHOUN COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Calhoun County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Calhoun County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members reasonable additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The compensation may not be lower than the compensation paid to a member on August 29, 1977. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Calhoun County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0371. CAMERON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Cameron County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Cameron County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the members of the juvenile board additional annual compensation of $4,500, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county. The commissioners court shall pay the members an additional $75 per month for performing the additional duties prescribed by Sections 152.0372 and 152.0373.

(c) The juvenile board shall hold meetings at least once every three months in accordance with board rules.

(d) The board shall keep records as required by law and board rules.

(e) A juvenile probation officer shall take the oath of office when appointed and the oath and the fact of the appointment shall be filed with the county clerk.

(f) The juvenile board may require a juvenile probation officer or facility superintendent to obtain a surety or personal bond in an amount determined by the board and conditioned on the faithful performance of the person's duties.

(g) The juvenile board may suspend or remove a juvenile probation officer at any time for good cause. The chief probation officer, with the approval of the board, may suspend or remove an assistant probation officer for good cause after the assistant is notified and afforded an opportunity to appear before the board.

(h) Sections 152.0002, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Cameron County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1108, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0372. CAMERON COUNTY INSTITUTIONS. (a) The juvenile board of Cameron County controls and supervises each county facility used for the detention of juveniles.

(b) The juvenile board by majority vote may adopt any order or regulation necessary to the welfare of juveniles in a county facility. The chief juvenile probation officer shall enter each order or regulation in a book kept for that purpose and shall certify the order or regulation and deliver a copy to each facility superintendent or person in charge of a facility. The superintendent or other person and each juvenile probation officer shall comply with the order or regulation.

(c) The juvenile board may require the superintendent or person in charge of a facility to submit to the board reports containing information required by the board.

(d) The district attorney of Cameron County shall assign an attorney in the district attorney's office to represent the juvenile board and probation officers in protecting the rights of children in abandonment cases and proceedings.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0373. COLLECTION AND DISBURSEMENT OF SUPPORT PAYMENTS IN CAMERON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Cameron County may require a juvenile probation officer to collect and disburse child support payments that are required by court order to be made to a court in the county.

(b) The juvenile probation officer shall keep a record of money received and disbursed in a well-bound book subject to public inspection in the probation office. The county auditor shall audit the records.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0381. CAMP COUNTY. (a) Camp County is included in the Camp, Marion, Morris, and Titus Counties Juvenile Board. The juvenile board is composed of the county judges, the district judges in Camp, Marion, Morris, and Titus counties, and the judge of each statutory court in those counties designated as a juvenile court.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(c) The juvenile board shall hold regular bimonthly meetings on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(d) The commissioners courts of the counties shall pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners courts at not less than $1,800 for the added duties imposed on them. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the counties. Each county shall pay an equal portion of the salaries.

(e) The juvenile board shall provide each juvenile probation officer with an automobile or an automobile allowance for use of a personal automobile on official business.

(f) The juvenile board shall pay the salaries of juvenile probation personnel and other expenses required to provide adequate services to children from the juvenile board fund to the extent of the state aid received in the fund. The counties shall pay equally the other salaries and expenses essential to provide adequate services to children in an amount set by the juvenile board.

(g) The board may accept state aid and grants or gifts from other political subdivisions of the state or associations for the sole purpose of financing adequate and effective probation programs.

(h) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, and 152.0009 do not apply to the Camp, Marion, Morris, and Titus Counties Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0391. CARSON COUNTY. (a) The Carson County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Carson County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional monthly compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $50 nor more than $150 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Carson County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0401. CASS COUNTY. (a) The Cass County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the judge of the County Court at Law of Cass County, and the district judges in Cass County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $600 nor more than $1,800 for the added duties imposed on them. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The juvenile board shall provide each juvenile probation officer with transportation or an automobile allowance for use of a personal automobile on official business.

(e) The juvenile board shall pay the salaries of juvenile probation personnel and other expenses required to provide adequate services to children from the juvenile board fund to the extent of the state aid received in the fund. The commissioners court shall pay the other salaries and expenses essential to provide adequate services to children in an amount set by the juvenile board.

(f) The commissioners court shall pay the expenses of the juvenile probation officers that are certified as necessary by the juvenile board chairman from the general fund and in the amount set by the juvenile board.

(g) The board may accept state aid and grants or gifts from other political subdivisions of the state or associations for the sole purpose of financing adequate and effective probation programs. A municipality may grant and allocate money to the county or to the juvenile board to support and maintain juvenile programs if the municipality's governing body approves the expenditure. Funds received under this subsection shall be administered and kept separately from other county funds.

(h) This section does not prohibit a program of local enrichment of juvenile services funded by any source.

(i) Sections 152.0004 and 152.0009 do not apply to the juvenile board of Cass County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 868 (H.B. 1500), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 152.0411. CASTRO COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Castro and Swisher counties is composed of the county judges, the district judges in Castro and Swisher counties, and the judge of any statutory court designated as a juvenile court in the counties.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman.

(c) The commissioners courts of the counties shall pay the members of the juvenile board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the counties. The counties shall apportion and pay the salary according to the method determined by the counties.

(d) The counties shall apportion and pay the juvenile board costs, other than the judge's salaries, according to the method determined by the counties.

(e) The commissioners courts shall pay the salaries and expenses of juvenile probation personnel and other expenses the chairman certifies as essential to provide services to children from the general funds or any other available funds of the counties.

(f) A member of the juvenile board is not liable in civil damages or for criminal prosecution for an action taken by the juvenile board.

(g) The juvenile board shall appoint an advisory council composed of five citizens from different parts of Castro and Swisher counties.

(h) Sections 152.0004 and 152.0005(b) do not apply to the juvenile board in Castro and Swisher counties.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 454, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Sec. 152.0421. CHAMBERS COUNTY. (a) The Chambers County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Chambers County, and the judge of any statutory county court designated as a juvenile court.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each calendar year.

(c) Service on the juvenile board is an additional duty of office. The commissioners court may pay the members of the juvenile board additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court for the added duties imposed on the members. The compensation is payable in equal monthly installments out of the general fund of the county.

(d) If approved by the juvenile board, the commissioners court shall reimburse the juvenile court judge for the judge's actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending seminars and other educational or instructional meetings relating to juvenile problems.

(e) The commissioners court shall provide the funds for the salaries of the juvenile probation officers in the amount set by the juvenile board.

(f) The commissioners court shall pay the expenses of the juvenile probation officers certified as necessary by the juvenile board chairman from the general fund of the county and in the amount set by the juvenile board.

(g) Sections 152.0004 and 152.0005(b) do not apply to the juvenile board of Chambers County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0431. CHEROKEE COUNTY. (a) The Cherokee County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Cherokee County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation in an amount determined by the commissioners court for the added duties imposed on the members. The combined yearly salary from state and county sources received by each judge may not exceed an amount equal to $1,000 less than the combined yearly salary from state and county sources received by each justice of the court of appeals of the court of appeals district in which Cherokee County is located. The additional compensation is payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Cherokee County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1077, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0441. CHILDRESS COUNTY. (a) The Childress County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Childress County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional monthly compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $50 nor more than $150 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Childress County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0461. COCHRAN COUNTY. (a) The Cochran County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judge in Cochran County, and the judge of any statutory court designated as a juvenile court in the county. The chairman shall appoint five public members to serve on the board for a period determined by the board.

(b) The county judge is the chairman of the juvenile board. The district judge is the vice-chairman and acts as chairman if:

(1) the chairman is absent or disabled; or

(2) the office of county judge is vacant.

(c) The juvenile board shall hold regular meetings at least annually on dates set by the board and shall hold special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(d) The commissioners court shall pay the judges on the juvenile board an annual salary set by the commissioners court, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county. Public members serve without compensation.

(e) The commissioners court may reimburse a juvenile board member for the member's reasonable and necessary job-related expenses. Reimbursable expenses include travel, lodging, training, and educational activities.

(f) The juvenile board shall pay the salaries of juvenile probation personnel and other expenses the chairman certifies as essential to provide services to the children of Cochran County from the juvenile board fund to the extent of the state aid received in the fund. The salaries approved by the commissioners court may be paid from funds received for that purpose from the Texas Juvenile Justice Department. The commissioners court shall pay the remaining approved salaries of juvenile probation personnel and other expenses certified as necessary by the juvenile board chairman from the general funds of the county.

(g) The chairman of the juvenile board shall certify to the commissioners court an annual request for the expenditure of county funds. The commissioners court shall act on the request in the same manner as it acts on a request from another county office.

(h) The county auditor shall serve as the board's fiscal officer.

(i) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Cochran County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 476, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 128, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 152.0471. COKE COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Coke County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Coke County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not more than $1,200 payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Coke County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0481. COLEMAN COUNTY. (a) The Coleman County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges having jurisdiction in Coleman County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board chairman additional annual compensation of not more than $1,800 for the added duties imposed on the chairman. The commissioners court may pay each of the other members of the juvenile board additional annual compensation of not more than $300. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Coleman County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0491. COLLIN COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Collin County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Collin County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation of not more than $6,000 as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation is payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Collin County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0501. COLLINGSWORTH COUNTY. (a) The Collingsworth County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Collingsworth County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional monthly compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $50 nor more than $150 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Collingsworth County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0511. COLORADO COUNTY. (a) The Colorado County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Colorado County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional monthly compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $100 nor more than $400 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salary and expenses of the juvenile probation officer.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Colorado County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0521. COMAL COUNTY. (a) The Comal County Juvenile Board is composed of:

(1) the county judge;

(2) the judge of each county court at law in the county;

(3) the judge of the 22nd District Court;

(4) the judge of the 207th District Court;

(5) the judge of the 433rd District Court;

(6) the judge of the 274th District Court; and

(7) the criminal district attorney of Comal County.

(a-1) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 152, Sec. 2, eff. May 23, 2009.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary in an amount set by the commissioners court as compensation for the additional duties imposed on the members. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Comal County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 285, Sec. 1, eff. June 5, 1995; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 4, Sec. 1, eff. April 10, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1325 (H.B. 3515), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 152 (S.B. 2134), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 152 (S.B. 2134), Sec. 2, eff. May 23, 2009.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 218 (S.B. 2255), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 152.0531. COMANCHE COUNTY. (a) Comanche County is included in the Bosque, Comanche, and Hamilton counties juvenile board. The juvenile board is composed of:

(1) the county judge in Bosque County;

(2) the county judge in Comanche County;

(3) the county judge in Hamilton County; and

(4) the 220th Judicial District judge.

(b) The 220th Judicial District judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court of Comanche County shall pay the county judge in Comanche County and the 220th Judicial District judge additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than the amount paid to a board member under this section on October 1, 1998. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Comanche County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 336, Sec. 2, eff. May 29, 1999.

Sec. 152.0541. CONCHO COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Concho County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Concho County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the board chairman additional annual compensation of not more than $600 for the added duties imposed on the chairman. The commissioners court may pay the other board members additional annual compensation of not more than $300. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Concho County.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1445, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 152.0551. COOKE COUNTY. (a) The Cooke County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Cooke County, and the judge of any statutory court designated as a juvenile court in the county.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the judges on the juvenile board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) Section 152.0005(b) does not apply to the juvenile board of Cooke County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0561. CORYELL COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Coryell County is composed of the county judge, the district judge or judges whose district includes Coryell County, and the judges of the county courts-at-law of Coryell County.

(b) The board shall select one of its members to serve as chairman and chief administrative officer. The chairman serves a one- or two-year term as determined by the board.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than the amount paid to a board member under this section on October 1, 1994. Compensation under this section must be the same amount for each board member. The additional compensation is paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The board may apply for, accept, hold in trust, spend, and use a gift, grant, or donation of land, money, or other personal property from a government, corporate, personal, or other source to finance adequate and effective probation programs and services.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Coryell County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 467, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 152.0571. COTTLE COUNTY. (a) Cottle County is included in the 50th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0181 applies to the 50th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0581. CRANE COUNTY. (a) The Crane County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Crane County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board chairman additional annual compensation of not more than $1,200. The commissioners court may pay the other members of the juvenile board additional annual compensation of not more than $600. The additional compensation is for the added duties imposed on the chairman and members and shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) The commissioners court shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation officer.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Crane County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0591. CROCKETT COUNTY. (a) The Crockett County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Crockett County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $3,600 as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Crockett County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0601. CROSBY COUNTY. (a) The Crosby County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Crosby County, and one public member appointed by the judges.

(b) The public member serves a two-year term.

(c) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(d) The members of the juvenile board do not receive compensation for serving on the board.

(e) The chief probation officer may set the salaries and allowances of juvenile probation personnel with the approval of the board.

(f) Sections 152.0003 and 152.0005(b) do not apply to the juvenile board of Crosby County.

(g) The juvenile board of Crosby County and the juvenile boards of one or more counties that are adjacent to or in close proximity to Crosby County may agree to operate together with respect to all matters, or with respect to certain matters specified by the juvenile boards. Juvenile boards operating together may appoint one fiscal officer to receive and disburse funds for the boards.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 82 (S.B. 511), Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 2021.

Sec. 152.0611. CULBERSON COUNTY. (a) The Culberson-Hudspeth Counties Juvenile Board is composed of the county judges and the district judges in Culberson and Hudspeth counties.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each calendar year.

(c) The commissioners courts shall pay the members of the juvenile board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments out of the general fund or any other available fund of the counties.

(d) If approved by the juvenile board, the commissioners courts shall reimburse each juvenile court judge for the judge's actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending seminars and other educational or instructional meetings relating to juvenile matters.

(e) The chief juvenile officer may set the salaries and allowances of juvenile probation personnel with the approval of the board.

(f) Unless the counties agree on a different method of allocating costs, each county shall pay the costs of the juvenile board in accordance with the ratio that the population of the county bears to the total population of the two counties.

(g) Section 152.0005(b) does not apply to the Culberson-Hudspeth Counties Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0621. DALLAM COUNTY. (a) The Dallam County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Dallam County, the judge of any statutory county court designated as a juvenile court, and one public member appointed by the commissioners court.

(b) The public member serves a two-year term.

(c) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(d) The board shall hold regular meetings each year on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(e) The board may cooperate with other juvenile boards to provide adequate services.

(f) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members a salary in an amount set by the commissioners court.

(g) The chief juvenile probation officer may appoint necessary personnel with the approval of the board and with the advice and consent of the commissioners court.

(h) The juvenile board shall use the juvenile probation fund to pay as much of the salaries and allowances and other necessary expenses as possible. The commissioners court shall pay the other salaries, allowances, and necessary expenses from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(i) The board may accept aid, grants, and gifts from the state, other political subdivisions of the state, or associations for the sole purpose of financing adequate and effective probation programs. A municipality may grant and allocate money to the county government or to the juvenile board to support and maintain juvenile programs if the municipality's governing body approves the expenditure. The fiscal officer shall deposit funds received under this subsection in a special account.

(j) If approved by the commissioners court, the county shall reimburse each juvenile board member for the member's reasonable and necessary job-related expenses. Reimbursable expenses include travel, lodging, training, and educational activities.

(k) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005(a) and (b), and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Dallam County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0631. DALLAS COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Dallas County is composed of:

(1) the county judge;

(2) one county commissioner appointed by the commissioners court;

(3) each juvenile court judge;

(4) the local administrative judge;

(5) one judge of a district court in Dallas County that gives preference to family matters, appointed by the judges of those courts;

(6) one judge of a district court in Dallas County that gives preference to criminal matters, appointed by the judges of those courts;

(7) one judge of a district court in Dallas County that gives preference to civil matters, appointed by the judges of those courts; and

(8) the chairman of the youth services advisory board.

(b) The appointed members serve one-year terms.

(c) The board shall hold an annual meeting in January and at this meeting shall elect a chairman from among the members. The board shall hold other regular meetings as determined by the board at the January meeting and may meet at the call of the chairman or at the request to the chairman of at least two members. The board shall keep accurate and complete minutes of its meetings. The minutes are open to public inspection.

(d) All county facilities and programs for children, other than the facilities and programs operated by the Dallas County Mental Health and Mental Retardation or the Dallas County Hospital District, are under the board's jurisdiction.

(e) The juvenile board shall set policies for the juvenile probation department and other departments, facilities, and programs under the board's jurisdiction.

(f) The juvenile board may make an annual written report to the commissioners court that relates to the operations and efficiency of the juvenile probation department, the county and other institutions for the care of neglected, dependent, and delinquent children, and the other facilities and programs under the jurisdiction of the board and to the general adequacy of the juvenile services provided by the county. The board may include in the report any recommendations for improvements that the board considers necessary.

(g) The board may investigate the operations of the juvenile probation department, the county institutions for the care of neglected, dependent, or delinquent children, or any other facility or program under the board's jurisdiction, at the request of the judges of the district courts in Dallas County. The board shall make a written report of the investigation to the commissioners court.

(h) The juvenile board may make any special studies or investigations it considers necessary to improve the operations of the juvenile probation departments and the county institutions under its jurisdiction.

(i) The juvenile board shall appoint a person to serve as the director of juvenile services and as chief juvenile probation officer.

(j) The board shall set the salary of the director of juvenile services. The director serves at the pleasure of the board.

(k) The board may apply for, accept, hold in trust, spend, and use a gift, grant, or donation of land, money, or other personal property from a governmental, corporate, personal, or other source to benefit the county facilities and programs under the jurisdiction of the board.

(l) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Dallas County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 12.05(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 152.0632. DALLAS COUNTY DIRECTOR OF JUVENILE SERVICES AND JUVENILE PROBATION DEPARTMENT. (a) The director of juvenile services in Dallas County is the chief administrative officer for the juvenile probation department and all facilities and programs under the jurisdiction of the juvenile board as authorized by the board.

(b) The director of juvenile services shall annually prepare under the juvenile board's direction a budget for the juvenile probation department, the county and other institutions for the care of neglected, dependent, and delinquent children, and the other facilities and programs under the jurisdiction of the juvenile board. The juvenile board shall approve the budget and submit the budget to the commissioners court for final approval in the same manner as prescribed by law for the other county agencies and departments.

(c) The director shall hire the employees of the juvenile probation department and of the county institutions and facilities and programs under the jurisdiction of the juvenile board. The director may remove a juvenile probation department employee at any time.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 12.05(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 152.0633. DALLAS COUNTY DISTRICT AND COUNTY COURTS ADMINISTRATOR AND COURT SERVICES DEPARTMENT. (a) The district and county courts administrator is the chief administrative officer of the court services department of Dallas County.

(b) The local administrative district judge and the judges of the district courts in Dallas County that give preference to civil, criminal, family law, or juvenile matters shall, on a majority vote, appoint and set the salary of the district and county courts administrator. The administrator serves at the will of those judges.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the salaries and expenses of the court services department employees as determined by the department budget submitted by the local administrative judge and approved by the commissioners court.

(d) A judge may not be subjected to a suit for, and is immune from liability for damages arising from, an act or omission committed while performing a duty under this section unless the act or omission is:

(1) committed intentionally, wilfully, or wantonly; or

(2) committed with:

(A) gross negligence; or

(B) conscious indifference or reckless disregard for the safety of others.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 12.05(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 658, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1171 (H.B. 3531), Sec. 1, eff. October 1, 2005.

Sec. 152.06331. DALLAS COUNTY DOMESTIC RELATIONS OFFICE. (a) The domestic relations office of Dallas County is established. Except to the extent of a conflict with this section, Chapter 203, Family Code, applies to the office, and the office has the powers and duties of a domestic relations office provided by that chapter.

(b) The judges of the district courts in Dallas County that give preference to family law matters shall, on a majority vote, appoint the director of the domestic relations office. The director serves at the will of those judges, except that those judges may delegate the decision to terminate the director's appointment to the presiding judge of those judges' courts.

(c) The judges of the district courts in Dallas County that give preference to family law matters shall, by majority vote, supervise the activities of the director and the domestic relations office, including the office's structure and budget, or those judges may delegate the supervisory duties to the presiding judge of those judges' courts.

(d) The domestic relations office shall report to the Dallas County district and county courts administrator, and the administrator shall report to the judges of the district courts in Dallas County that give preference to family law matters, regarding:

(1) the domestic relations office's performance of all matters relating to family court services or successor services and child support collection and administration; and

(2) all other functions performed by the office.

(e) The judges of the district courts in Dallas County that give preference to family law matters have final authority over decisions regarding the administration of the functions and duties of the domestic relations office and have the right to direct the district and county courts administrator to adopt and adhere to the policies adopted by the judges with regard to the domestic relations office.

(f) Fees for the preparation of a court-ordered child custody evaluation or adoption evaluation or any other services provided by the domestic relations office, other than services related to the collection of child support, must be reasonable and imposed on a sliding scale according to the financial resources of the parties using the services.

(g) A judge may not be subjected to a suit for, and is immune from liability for damages arising from, an act or omission committed while performing a duty under this section unless the act or omission is:

(1) committed intentionally, wilfully, or wantonly; or

(2) committed with:

(A) gross negligence; or

(B) conscious indifference or reckless disregard for the safety of others.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1171 (H.B. 3531), Sec. 2, eff. October 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1252 (H.B. 1449), Sec. 3.08, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 152.06332. DALLAS COUNTY CRIMINAL DISTRICT COURTS ADMINISTRATOR. (a) The criminal district courts administrator is the chief administrative officer of the criminal district courts in Dallas County.

(b) The judges of the district courts in Dallas County that give preference to criminal law matters shall, on a majority vote, appoint the criminal district courts administrator. The administrator serves at the will of a majority of those judges, except that those judges may delegate the decision to terminate the administrator's appointment to the presiding judge of those judges' courts.

(c) The judges of the district courts in Dallas County that give preference to criminal law matters shall, by majority vote, supervise the activities of the criminal district courts administrator, including the structure of the administrator's office and budget for that office, or those judges may delegate the supervisory duties to the presiding judge of those courts.

(d) The criminal district courts administrator shall report to the Dallas County district and county courts administrator, and the district and county courts administrator shall report to the judges of the criminal district courts in Dallas County, regarding all issues related to the criminal district courts.

(e) The judges of the district courts that give preference to criminal law matters in Dallas County have the final authority over decisions regarding the administration of the areas related to the criminal district courts in Dallas County and have the right to direct the district and county courts administrator to adopt and adhere to the policies adopted by the judges with regard to the criminal district courts in Dallas County.

(f) A judge may not be subjected to a suit for, and is immune from liability for damages arising from, an act or omission committed while performing a duty under this section unless the act or omission is:

(1) committed intentionally, wilfully, or wantonly; or

(2) committed with:

(A) gross negligence; or

(B) conscious indifference or reckless disregard for the safety of others.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1171 (H.B. 3531), Sec. 2, eff. October 1, 2005.

Sec. 152.0636. CERTIFICATE OF INDEBTEDNESS FOR FACILITIES. (a) Certificates of indebtedness issued and sold by the Commissioners Court of Dallas County to acquire property and to construct, enlarge, furnish, equip, and repair buildings used as homes and schools for delinquent children that have been submitted to the attorney general, approved by the attorney general, and registered by the comptroller are incontestable.

(b) The certificates are legal and authorized investments for:

(1) banks;

(2) savings banks;

(3) trust companies;

(4) savings and loan associations;

(5) insurance companies;

(6) fiduciaries;

(7) trustees;

(8) guardians; and

(9) sinking funds of municipalities, counties, school districts, and other political subdivisions of the state and other public funds of the state and its agencies.

(c) The certificates are eligible to secure deposits of public funds of the state and of municipalities, counties, school districts, and other political subdivisions of the state. The certificates are lawful and sufficient security for deposits to the extent of their market or face value, whichever is less, if accompanied by all unmatured coupons.

(d) The commissioners court shall continue to levy a tax that is sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the certificates so long as certificates are outstanding.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0641. DAWSON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Dawson County is composed of:

(1) the county judge and the district judges in Dawson County;

(2) the superintendent of the Lamesa Independent School District or the superintendent's designee;

(3) one citizen of Dawson County appointed by the county commissioners court; and

(4) one citizen of Dawson County appointed by the Lamesa City Council.

(b) Citizen members serve two-year terms.

(c) The county judge is the chairman of the juvenile board and its chief administrative officer.

(d) The county commissioners court shall pay the judges on the juvenile board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(e) Section 152.0005(b) does not apply to the juvenile board of Dawson County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0651. DEAF SMITH COUNTY. (a) The Deaf Smith County Juvenile Board is composed of:

(1) the county judge;

(2) two persons appointed by the Hereford City Commission;

(3) two persons appointed by the commissioners court; and

(4) two persons appointed by the board of trustees of the Hereford Independent School District.

(b) The appointed members serve staggered two-year terms with the terms of one person appointed by the city, one person appointed by the county, and one person appointed by the school district expiring on December 31 of each year.

(c) The board shall elect one of its members as chairman.

(d) Board members serve without compensation.

(e) The commissioners court, Hereford City Commission, and the board of trustees of the Hereford Independent School District may agree to pay equally the costs of the salaries and expenses of the juvenile department. The commissioners court, city commission, and board of trustees shall determine the length of the agreement. The city of Hereford and the Hereford Independent School District may appropriate and spend money to implement this subsection.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Deaf Smith County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0671. DENTON COUNTY. (a) The Denton County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Denton County, and the judge of any county court at law in the county.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,500, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) If approved by the juvenile board, the commissioners court shall reimburse each juvenile court judge for the judge's actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending seminars and other educational or instructional meetings related to juvenile matters.

(e) Section 152.0005(b) does not apply to the juvenile board of Denton County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 14.001, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 152.0681. DE WITT COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of De Witt County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in De Witt County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members reasonable additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The compensation may not be lower than the compensation paid to a member on August 29, 1977. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of De Witt County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0691. DICKENS COUNTY. (a) Dickens County is included in the 110th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0291 applies to the 110th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0711. DONLEY COUNTY. (a) The Donley County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judges and the district judges in Donley County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional monthly compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $50 nor more than $150 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Donley County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0721. DUVAL COUNTY. (a) The Duval County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judge in Duval County, and a citizen of Duval County appointed by the county judge and the district judge in Duval County. The citizen member of the board serves the same term of office as the district judge in Duval County.

(b) The district judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 or more than $10,000 for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The juvenile board shall appoint not more than five persons to serve on an advisory council.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Duval County.

(f) The Duval County Juvenile Board and the juvenile boards of one or more counties that are adjacent to or in close proximity to Duval County may agree to operate together with respect to all matters, or with respect to certain matters specified by the juvenile boards. Juvenile boards operating together may appoint one fiscal officer to receive and disburse funds for the boards.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1143, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 34, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 702 (H.B. 2804), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 152.0731. EASTLAND COUNTY. (a) The Eastland County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the judge of the 91st Judicial District, the criminal district attorney, and the county sheriff.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The compensation is in addition to any other salary a county attorney or sheriff receives and is paid from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Eastland County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0741. ECTOR COUNTY. (a) The Ector County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Ector County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board.

(c) The county commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $4,800 nor more than $6,000. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Each juvenile probation officer shall take the oath of office and the oath and the fact of the officer's appointment shall be filed with the county clerk. The juvenile board may require an officer to obtain a bond conditioned on the faithful performance of the officer's duties and payable to the county treasurer in an amount determined by the board.

(e) The commissioners court shall approve the salaries of the juvenile probation officers and other personnel and provide the necessary funds to pay their salaries and expenses. The county shall pay the salaries in equal monthly installments.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Ector County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 596, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0742. COMPENSATION OF JUVENILE COURT JUDGE. (a) If designated as the juvenile court judge, the judge of the County Court at Law of Ector County may be paid additional annual compensation of not more than $3,000 for serving as juvenile court judge.

(b) The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0751. EDWARDS COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Edwards County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Edwards County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $3,600, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Edwards County.

(d) The juvenile board of Edwards County and the juvenile boards of one or more counties that are adjacent to or in close proximity to Edwards County may agree to operate together. Juvenile boards operating together may appoint one fiscal officer to receive and disburse funds for the boards.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (S.B. 1832), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 152.0761. ELLIS COUNTY. (a) The Ellis County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Ellis County, and the judge of each statutory court in the county.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members an annual salary of not less than $3,600, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) The commissioners court shall pay the salaries of juvenile probation personnel and other expenses the chairman certifies as essential to provide services to children from the general fund of the county.

(e) Juvenile probation officers serve at the pleasure of the juvenile board.

(f) Sections 152.0004, 152.0005(b), and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Ellis County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0771. EL PASO COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of El Paso County is composed of:

(1) the county judge or:

(A) a member of the commissioners court designated by the county judge; or

(B) an individual who is not a member of the commissioners court and who is designated by the county judge and approved by the commissioners court by majority vote;

(2) each family district court judge;

(3) each juvenile court judge;

(4) up to five judges on the "El Paso Council of Judges" to be elected by majority vote of that council;

(5) a municipal judge from El Paso County selected by the chairman of the juvenile board of El Paso County; and

(6) a justice of the peace in El Paso County selected by the chairman of the juvenile board of El Paso County.

(b) Repealed by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 317, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

(c) The juvenile board shall hold meetings at least once every three months in accordance with board rules.

(d) The board shall keep records as required by law and board rules.

(e) A juvenile probation officer shall take the oath of office when appointed and the oath and the fact of the appointment shall be filed with the county clerk.

(f) The commissioners court shall provide the juvenile probation officers with:

(1) automobiles and their maintenance and operation expenses for use in official duties; or

(2) an automobile allowance for the use of a personal automobile on official business in the amount determined to be necessary by the commissioners court.

(g), (h) Repealed by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 317, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 317, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 371, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 300 (H.B. 1334), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 152.0772. EL PASO COUNTY INSTITUTIONS. (a) The juvenile board of El Paso County shall appoint a person to supervise the county facilities under the jurisdiction of the juvenile board. The supervisor may be the county probation officer. The supervisor shall direct the policies and conduct of each institution.

(b) The juvenile board shall also appoint the head of each facility. The facility head may hire employees that the juvenile board determines are necessary.

(c) The facilities supervisor or employees under the supervisor's control shall supervise each child committed to a county institution until the child becomes of age. The supervisor or employees shall submit periodic reports to the juvenile board as required for the board's approval or action.

(d) The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to operate each institution.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0773. COLLECTION AND DISBURSEMENT OF SUPPORT PAYMENTS IN EL PASO COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of El Paso County may designate the district clerk or the juvenile probation officer to collect and disburse court-ordered child or spousal support payments that are required by court order to be made to the county. The person designated to receive the payments shall disburse the payments in the manner the court believes to be in the best interest of the spouse or child.

(b) If the juvenile board designates the juvenile probation officer to receive the payments, the officer shall work in the court as an officer of the court. The officer shall obtain a surety bond in an amount determined by the county auditor from a solvent surety company authorized to make the bonds in this state and approved by the county auditor. The bond shall be conditioned on the faithful performance of the officer's duties and on the proper accounting of the money entrusted to the officer.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0791. FALLS COUNTY. (a) Falls County is part of the Milam, Robertson, Falls Counties Juvenile Board. The juvenile board is composed of the county judges, the district judges in the counties, and the judges of any statutory court in the counties designated as a juvenile court. The board by unanimous vote may appoint five public members to serve on the board.

(b) The public members serve staggered terms of not more than two years as determined by the board.

(c) The board shall appoint one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each calendar year.

(d) The board shall hold biannual meetings on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(e) Service on a juvenile board by a judge is an additional duty of office. The commissioners courts may pay the judges on the juvenile board an amount that will reasonably compensate them for their added duties. Public members serve without compensation.

(f) The counties shall reimburse a juvenile board member for the member's actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing the member's duties.

(g) The juvenile board shall ensure that the chief juvenile officer and fiscal officer:

(1) keep the financial and statistical records and submit reports to the Texas Juvenile Justice Department as prescribed by Section 221.007; and

(2) submit periodic financial and statistical reports to the commissioners courts.

(h) The chief juvenile probation officer shall appoint an appropriate number of qualified juvenile probation officers, assistants, and support personnel with the approval of the board as necessary to perform the chief juvenile probation officer's duties. The chief juvenile probation officer and the personnel appointed under this section may be removed at any time by the appointing authority or by the juvenile board. The chief juvenile probation officer shall recommend to the juvenile board the salaries of and allowances for juvenile probation officers, assistants, and support personnel. The juvenile board shall provide the chief juvenile probation officer and the officer's assistants with transportation or an automobile allowance for use of a personal automobile on official business.

(i) A claim for expenses from a person in the juvenile probation department must be made to the board chairman. The chairman shall certify to the fiscal officer the expenses to be paid from state funds and shall certify to the commissioners courts the expenses to be paid from county funds.

(j) The chairman of the board shall certify to the commissioners courts an annual request for the expenditure of county funds. The commissioners courts shall act on the request in the same manner as they act on a request from another county office.

(k) The board may accept state aid and grants or gifts from other political subdivisions of the state or associations to finance adequate and effective juvenile programs. A municipality may grant and allocate money to the juvenile board to support and maintain effective juvenile services if the municipality's governing body approves the expenditure. Funds received under this subsection shall be administered and kept separately from other public funds. This section does not affect a program of local enrichment of juvenile services funded by a service.

(l) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0008, and 152.0009 do not apply to the Milam, Robertson, Falls Counties Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 3.019, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 152.0801. FANNIN COUNTY. The Fannin County Juvenile Board is governed by Subchapter B.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 198 (S.B. 1886), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2011.

Sec. 152.0811. FAYETTE COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Fayette County is composed of:

(1) the county judge;

(2) the judge of each district court in Fayette County;

(3) the judge of each statutory county court in Fayette County; and

(4) a public member only if the total number of board members described by Subdivisions (1)-(3) is fewer than three or is an even number.

(a-1) A public member who serves on the board must be appointed by a majority of the other members of the board. The public member serves a two-year term.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members compensation of $1,200 annually for the duties imposed on the members. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Fayette County.

(d) The board member who has the greatest number of years of judicial service and is willing to serve is the chair of the board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 8.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 152.0821. FISHER COUNTY.

(a) Fisher County is included in the 32nd Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.1831 applies to the 32nd Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 4(1), eff. October 1, 2017.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 4(1), eff. October 1, 2017.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 4(1), eff. October 1, 2017.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 4(1), eff. October 1, 2017.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 4(1), eff. October 1, 2017.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 246, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 1, eff. October 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 4(1), eff. October 1, 2017.

Sec. 152.0831. FLOYD COUNTY. (a) Floyd County is included in the 110th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0291 applies to the 110th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0841. FOARD COUNTY. (a) Foard County is included in the 46th Judicial District Juvenile Board. The juvenile board is composed of:

(1) the county judges of Foard, Hardeman, and Wilbarger counties;

(2) the judge of the 46th Judicial District; and

(3) two public members appointed by the judges.

(b) The public members serve one-year terms.

(c) The district judge is the chairman of the board.

(d) Service on a juvenile board by a judge is an additional duty of office. The commissioners courts shall pay the judges on the juvenile board additional annual compensation of not more than $1,200 for the added duties imposed on them. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general funds of the counties.

(e) If approved by the juvenile board, each county shall reimburse the juvenile court judge in the county for the judge's actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending seminars and other educational or instructional meetings relating to juvenile problems.

(f) The commissioners courts shall provide the funds for the salaries of the juvenile probation officers in the amount set by the juvenile board.

(g) The commissioners courts shall pay the expenses of the juvenile probation officers that are certified as necessary by the juvenile board chairman from the general fund and in the amount set by the juvenile board.

(h) Sections 152.0004 and 152.0005(b) do not apply to the 46th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0851. FORT BEND COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Fort Bend County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Fort Bend County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the board members annual additional compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county. The judge of a county court at law is entitled to receive the same amount of additional compensation as the county judge receives.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Fort Bend County.

(d) The board by majority vote shall annually elect one of its members as chairman.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 55, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 152.0852. FORT BEND COUNTY CHILD SUPPORT OFFICE. (a) The judges of the district courts in Fort Bend County may establish a child support office in the county juvenile office to collect and disburse child support payments that are required by court order to be made to the office. The office shall disburse the payments in the manner the court believes to be in the best interest of the parties in the case.

(b) The judges of the district courts in a county served by an office may appoint an administrator and other assistants to serve two-year terms. The administrator shall obtain a surety bond in an amount determined by the county auditor from a solvent surety company authorized to make the bonds in this state and approved by the county auditor. The bond shall be conditioned on the faithful performance of the administrator's duties and on the proper accounting of the money entrusted to the administrator. The county shall pay the premium for the bond from the general fund of the county, the child support fund, or any other available fund.

(c) The judges shall determine the duties of the administrator and assistants and set their salaries. The salaries are payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county, the child support fund, or any other available fund. The judges must approve a claim for expenses made by the administrator or an assistant or a claim for administrative expenses in operating the child support office, including a claim for payment of equipment and supplies.

(d) The office shall keep an accurate and complete record of money received and disbursed under this section. The record is open for public inspection. The county auditor or other authorized county officer or employee shall inspect and examine the records and audit the accounts quarterly. The auditor shall report the results of the audit to the judges and include any recommendations the auditor may have.

(e) The child support office may serve one or more of Brazoria, Matagorda, or Wharton counties. If a child support office serves more than one county, the judges of the district courts in the counties shall determine the location of the office. The officers and employees of the county in which the office is located shall perform the duties prescribed by this section. The counties shall pay the salaries, bond premium, and other expenses in accordance with the ratio that the population of each county bears to the total population of all of the counties served by the office.

(f) The commissioners courts shall pay the district court judges $75 a month for performing the duties prescribed by this section. The compensation shall be paid from the general fund of the county and is in addition to any other compensation the judges receive.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0853. FORT BEND COUNTY CHILD SUPPORT SERVICE FEE. (a) The Fort Bend County child support office shall assess a monthly fee of not more than $10 for collecting and disbursing child support payments that are required by court order to be made to the office. The fee is payable annually and in advance.

(b) The payor of the support shall pay the fee unless the payor is a member of the armed services and the monthly child support payments exceed the amount the court orders the person to pay, in which case the payee shall pay the service fee for as long as the payor is a member of the armed services and the support payments exceed the amount the court orders the person to pay.

(c) The first fee payment is due on the date that the payor is ordered to begin the child support payments. If the payee must pay the fee, the first fee payment is due on the date that the payee receives the original support payment. Subsequent annual fees are due on the anniversary of the date of the original fee payment.

(d) A person who refuses or fails to pay the fee on the date due or in the amount ordered is subject to an action for contempt of court.

(e) Fees collected under this section shall be paid to the county treasurer on the last day of each calendar month. The county treasurer shall deposit the fees to the credit of the child support fund. The judges of the district courts in a county served by the office shall administer the fund, with the approval of the commissioners court, to assist in paying the salaries and expenses of the child support office.

(f) An accurate and complete record of money received under this section shall be kept. The county auditor or other authorized person shall audit the child support fund regularly. An annual report of the receipts and expenditures of the fund shall be made to the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 12.04(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 152.0881. FRIO COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Frio County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Frio County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $4,800 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Frio County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0901. GALVESTON COUNTY. (a) The Galveston County Juvenile Board is composed of:

(1) the county judge;

(2) the district judges in Galveston County;

(3) the judge of each statutory county court;

(4) a municipal judge in Galveston County, selected by majority vote of all the municipal judges in the county; and

(5) a justice of the peace in Galveston County, selected by majority vote of all the justices of the peace in the county.

(b) The juvenile board annually shall elect its chairman and other officers.

(c) The juvenile board members do not receive compensation for serving on the juvenile board. The county commissioners court shall pay the members $75 per month for performing the additional duties prescribed by Sections 152.0902 and 152.0903.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 5309), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

(e) A juvenile probation officer shall take the oath of office when appointed and the oath and the fact of the appointment shall be filed with the county clerk.

(f) The juvenile board may require a juvenile probation officer or facility superintendent to obtain a surety or personal bond in an amount determined by the board and conditioned on the faithful performance of the person's duties.

(g) The board chairman shall certify a claim for expenses as being necessary for the performance of the officer's duties. The county commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses.

(h) The commissioners court shall appoint a citizens' advisory committee composed of not more than 15 persons. The committee shall consult with the juvenile board and the commissioners court on matters relating to juveniles. The committee annually shall elect a chairman and other officers and may meet at its own discretion.

(i) Sections 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Galveston County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1140, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 5309), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 5309), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 152.0902. GALVESTON COUNTY INSTITUTIONS. (a) The juvenile board of Galveston County controls and supervises each county facility used for the detention of juveniles.

(b) The juvenile board by majority vote may adopt any order or regulation necessary to the welfare of juveniles in a county facility. The chief juvenile probation officer shall enter each order or regulation in a book kept for that purpose and shall certify the order or regulation and deliver a copy to each facility superintendent or person in charge of a facility. The superintendent or other person and each juvenile probation officer shall comply with the order or regulation.

(c) The juvenile board may require the superintendent or person in charge of a facility to submit to the board reports containing information required by the board.

(d) The criminal district attorney of Galveston County shall assign an attorney in the district attorney's office to represent the juvenile board and probation officers in protecting the rights of children in abandonment cases and proceedings.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0903. COLLECTION AND DISBURSEMENT OF SUPPORT PAYMENTS IN GALVESTON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Galveston County may require a juvenile probation officer to collect and disburse child support payments that are required by court order to be made to a court in the county.

(b) The juvenile probation officer shall keep a record of money received and disbursed in a well-bound book subject to public inspection in the probation office. The county auditor shall audit the records.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0911. GARZA COUNTY. (a) The Garza County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Garza County, and the judge of any statutory court in the county designated as a juvenile court. The juvenile court judge may appoint five citizen members to serve on the board for a term set by the judge.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the judges on the juvenile board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $120, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county. The citizen members serve without compensation.

(d) The chief juvenile probation officer may set the salaries and allowances of juvenile probation personnel with the approval of the board.

(e) Section 152.0005(b) does not apply to the juvenile board of Garza County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0921. GILLESPIE COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Gillespie County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Gillespie County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $600 nor more than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Gillespie County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0931. GLASSCOCK COUNTY. (a) Glasscock County is included in the 118th Judicial District Juvenile Board. The juvenile board is composed of the county judges and the district judges in Glasscock, Howard, and Martin counties.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each calendar year.

(c) The juvenile board shall hold regular quarterly meetings at the call of the chairman.

(d) The chief juvenile probation officer may set the salaries and allowances of juvenile probation personnel with the approval of the board.

(e) Each county shall pay the expenses of the juvenile board in accordance with the ratio that the population of the county bears to the total population of the three counties.

(f) Each county judge who is a member of the board shall appoint two citizens to serve on an advisory council. A vacancy on the juvenile board is filled by the county judge who appointed the original member.

(g) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, and 152.0005(b) do not apply to the 118th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0941. GOLIAD COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Goliad County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Goliad County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members reasonable additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The compensation may not be lower than the compensation paid to a member on August 29, 1977. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, and 152.0005 do not apply to the juvenile board of Goliad County.

(d) The juvenile board of Goliad County and the juvenile boards of one or more counties that are adjacent to or in close proximity to Goliad County may agree to operate together with respect to all matters, or with respect to certain matters specified by the juvenile boards. Juvenile boards operating together may appoint one fiscal officer to receive and disburse funds for the boards.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 8.02, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 152.0951. GONZALES COUNTY. (a) The Gonzales County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Gonzales County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional monthly compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $100 nor more than $400 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation officer.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Gonzales County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0961. GRAY COUNTY. (a) The Gray County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Gray County.

(b) The county judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional compensation in an amount that will reasonably compensate them for their added duties. The commissioners court shall also reimburse the members for the members' actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing their duties. The commissioners court may not reduce the members' compensation or expenses below the amount paid to the members as compensation and expenses on June 6, 1979. Each member shall receive equal compensation.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Gray County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0971. GRAYSON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Grayson County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Grayson County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court. The additional compensation is for the added duties imposed on the members and shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Grayson County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0981. GREGG COUNTY. (a) The Gregg County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Gregg County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The county judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary in an amount set by the commissioners court. The salary is for the added duties imposed on the members and shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Repealed by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 17, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 17, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.0991. GRIMES COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Grimes County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Grimes County, and the judge of each county court at law in the county.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 annually, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Grimes County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1152 (H.B. 3045), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 8.03, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 152.1001. GUADALUPE COUNTY. (a) The Guadalupe County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Guadalupe County. The county judge may add the judge of the county court at law to the board or may, from time to time, designate the judge of the county court at law to serve on the board in the county judge's place.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional monthly compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $100 nor more than $400 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salary and expenses of the juvenile probation officer.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Guadalupe County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1011. HALE COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Hale County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Hale County, and the judge of any statutory court designated as a juvenile court in the county.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the members of the juvenile board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The commissioners court shall pay the salaries and expenses of juvenile probation personnel and other expenses the chairman certifies as essential to provide services to children from the general funds or any other available funds of the county.

(e) A member of the juvenile board is not liable in civil damages or for criminal prosecution for an action taken by the juvenile board.

(f) The juvenile board shall appoint an advisory council composed of five citizens from different parts of Hale County.

(g) Sections 152.0004 and 152.0005(b) do not apply to the juvenile board in Hale County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 454, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Sec. 152.1021. HALL COUNTY. (a) The Hall County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judges and the district judges in Hall County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional monthly compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $50 nor more than $150 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Hall County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1031. HAMILTON COUNTY. (a) Hamilton County is included in the Bosque, Comanche, and Hamilton counties juvenile board. The juvenile board is composed of:

(1) the county judge in Bosque County;

(2) the county judge in Comanche County;

(3) the county judge in Hamilton County; and

(4) the 220th Judicial District judge.

(b) The 220th Judicial District judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court of Hamilton County shall pay the county judge in Hamilton County and the 220th Judicial Disrict judge additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than the amount paid to a board member under this section on October 1, 1998. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Hamilton County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 336, Sec. 3, eff. May 29, 1999.

Sec. 152.1041. HANSFORD COUNTY. (a) The Hansford County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Hansford County, and the judge of any statutory county court designated as a juvenile court.

(b) The board shall hold regular meetings each year on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(c) The board may cooperate with other juvenile boards to provide adequate services.

(d) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members a salary in an amount set by the commissioners court.

(e) The county auditor shall serve as the board's fiscal officer.

(f) The chief juvenile probation officer may appoint necessary personnel with the approval of the board and with the advice and consent of the commissioners court.

(g) The juvenile board shall use the juvenile probation fund to pay as much of the salaries and allowances, and other necessary expenses as possible. The commissioners court shall pay the other salaries, allowances, and necessary expenses from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(h) The board may accept aid, grants, or gifts from the state, other political subdivisions of the state, or associations for the sole purpose of financing adequate and effective probation programs. A municipality may grant and allocate money to the county government or to the juvenile board to support and maintain juvenile programs if the municipality's governing body approves the expenditure. The fiscal officer shall deposit funds received under this subsection in a special account.

(i) If approved by the commissioners court, the county shall reimburse each juvenile board member for the member's reasonable and necessary job-related expenses. Reimbursable expenses include travel, lodging, training, and educational activities.

(j) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005(a) and (b), 152.0006, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Hansford County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1051. HARDEMAN COUNTY. (a) Hardeman County is included in the 46th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0841 applies to the 46th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1061. HARDIN COUNTY. (a) The Hardin County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Hardin County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not more than $5,000 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation officer.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Hardin County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1071. HARRIS COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Harris County is composed of:

(1) the county judge;

(2) the juvenile court judges;

(3) one judge of a district court that primarily hears family law matters, selected by those judges;

(4) one judge of a district court that primarily hears criminal law cases, selected by those judges;

(5) one judge of a district court that primarily hears civil cases, selected by those judges; and

(6) a justice of the peace in Harris County, selected by majority vote of all of the justices of the peace in the county.

(b) At the first meeting in January each year the board shall elect a chairman from among the members. The board shall hold regular monthly meetings and may meet at the call of the chairman or at the written request to the chairman of at least two members. The board shall keep accurate and complete minutes of its meetings. The minutes are open to public inspection.

(c) Subject to the approval of the commissioners court, the juvenile board shall establish a general personnel policy for the employees of the probation department and the county institutions under the jurisdiction of the board. The board shall establish and maintain an employee classification system that includes:

(1) an accurate statement of the duties of each employee position;

(2) the qualifications for each position; and

(3) a compensation plan that ensures equal pay for equal work.

(d) The juvenile board shall make an annual written report to the commissioners court that relates to the operations and efficiency of the juvenile probation department and the county institutions under the jurisdiction of the board and to the general adequacy of the juvenile services provided by the county. The board may include in the report any recommendations for improvements that the board considers necessary.

(e) The board shall investigate the operations of the juvenile probation department and the county institutions under the jurisdiction of the board at the request of the juvenile court judge. The board shall make a written report of the investigation to the commissioners court.

(f) The juvenile board may make any special studies or investigations it considers necessary to improve the operations of the juvenile probation departments and the county institutions under its jurisdiction.

(g) Subject to the approval of the commissioners court, the board may accept and hold in trust a grant or donation of land, money, or other personal property to benefit the county facilities under the jurisdiction of the board.

(h) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Harris County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 741, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 152.1072. HARRIS COUNTY JUVENILE PROBATION DEPARTMENT. (a) The Harris County chief probation officer is the chief administrative officer of the juvenile probation department and the director of the county institutions under the jurisdiction of the juvenile board.

(b) The chief probation officer shall annually prepare under the juvenile board's direction a budget for the juvenile probation department and the county institutions under the jurisdiction of the juvenile board. The juvenile board shall approve the budget and submit the budget to the commissioners court for final approval in the same manner prescribed by law for the other county agencies and departments.

(c) The chief probation officer shall hire the employees of the juvenile probation department and of the county institutions under the jurisdiction of the juvenile board. The chief probation officer may remove an employee at any time. The appointment and removal of supervisors of the probation department and of superintendents of county institutions are subject to approval by the juvenile board. The commissioners court shall pay the salaries and expenses of the employees as determined by the budget submitted by the juvenile board and approved by the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1073. HARRIS COUNTY BOARD OF RESOURCES FOR CHILDREN AND ADULTS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Board" means the Harris County Board of Resources for Children and Adults.

(2) "Director" means the highest administrative officer who is responsible to the board.

(3) "Institution" means an institution for the care and protection of children who have been abandoned or abused, or are for any other reason in need of protective services. The term does not include a detention facility for delinquent children or children in need of supervision or a facility primarily for children with severe psychological or other medical conditions.

(b) The board has the powers and duties of a child welfare board created under Section 264.005, Family Code.

(c) The board may, with the approval of the commissioners court, assume jurisdiction, management, and control over a county owned institution. If the board assumes control and management of an institution, the board shall perform the functions in relation to the institutions that the juvenile board and chief probation officer of Harris County formerly performed.

(d) The board may designate the director or a specially designated assistant as the director of one or more institutions.

(e) The board may hire and remove institution employees. The board shall establish a general personnel policy for institution employees and shall pay the salaries and expenses of the employees from funds supplied by the commissioners court under the annual budget or supplemental budget approved by the commissioners court or from funds supplied by the state or other sources.

(f) The board shall prepare an annual budget for the institutions and submit the budget to the commissioners court for final approval as prescribed by law for other county agencies and departments. The board shall also make an annual report to the commissioners court on the operations and efficiency of the institutions.

(g) In addition to the authority granted to the board by the commissioners court, the Health and Human Services Commission, and the Department of Family and Protective Services, the board may:

(1) disburse funds from sources other than the commissioners court, the commission, and the department to benefit children, eligible adults with disabilities, and eligible elderly persons under this section and to provide care, protection, evaluation, training, treatment, education, and recreation to those persons;

(2) refuse to accept any funds the board considers to be inappropriate, incompatible, or burdensome to board policies or the provision of services;

(3) accept a gift or grant of real or personal property or accept support under or an interest in a trust to benefit persons described by Subdivision (1) and hold the gift or grant directly or in trust;

(4) use a gift or grant to benefit persons described by Subdivision (1) and to provide care, protection, education, or training to those persons;

(5) accept and disburse as provided by Subdivision (1) fees and contributions from parents, guardians, and relatives of persons described by that subdivision who are:

(A) in county supported substitute care or custody, in the county guardianship program, in the county representative payee program, or receiving services from the county Senior Justice Assessment Center; or

(B) being assisted by casework, day care, or homemaker services, by medical, psychological, dental, or other remedial help, or by teaching, training, or other services;

(6) account for and spend funds the board receives as fees, contributions, payments made by guardians, or payments made to benefit a person described by Subdivision (1) who is in the board's or the county's legal custody;

(7) receive and disburse funds available to support or benefit a person described by Subdivision (1) who is in the board's or the county's legal custody, including social security benefits, life insurance proceeds, survivors' pension or annuity benefits, or a beneficial interest in property; and

(8) receive and use funds, grants, and assistance available to the board or the county from a federal or state department or agency to carry out the functions and programs of the department or agency that is designed to aid or extend programs and operations approved by the board.

(h) The board shall designate the director or an assistant to apply for letters of guardianship if necessary to receive funds under Subsection (g)(7). The director or an assistant may:

(1) apply for and disburse the funds to provide special items of support for children, eligible adults with disabilities, and eligible elderly persons under this section or to pay general administrative expenses relating to services under this section;

(2) hold the funds in trust; or

(3) apply the funds for a particular or more restricted purpose as required by law or the source of the funds.

(h-1) The board may collaborate with state agencies to provide services for eligible adults with disabilities and eligible elderly persons who:

(1) are residents of the county;

(2) have been exploited, abused, or neglected; or

(3) may be in need of a guardianship or assistance from a representative payee.

(i) The board may delegate to the director or an assistant any function or duty authorized or prescribed by this section. If the board delegates the duty to prepare the annual budget and report, the board must approve the budget and report before they are submitted to the commissioners court. The board may periodically review any delegation.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 7.50, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 60 (H.B. 1763), Sec. 2, eff. May 11, 2007.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 334 (H.B. 2091), Sec. 1, eff. June 7, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 334 (H.B. 2091), Sec. 2, eff. June 7, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 334 (H.B. 2091), Sec. 3, eff. June 7, 2021.

Sec. 152.1074. HARRIS COUNTY CHILD SUPPORT DEPARTMENT. (a) The Harris County Commissioners Court may create a child support department to receive, disburse, and record payments of restitution and child and spousal support made to the department under a court order or may designate by order a county officer to create a child support office within the officer's department to receive, disburse, and record payments of restitution and child and spousal support made to the office under a court order. The commissioners court may rescind the order designating the officer at any time.

(b) The commissioners court may appoint an advisory board to advise the court on matters relating to the policies and procedures of the child support department. The advisory board consists of seven judges of district courts in Harris County whose courts specialize in family or juvenile cases.

(c) If the commissioners court creates a child support department, the commissioners court shall appoint a director to serve at the pleasure of the commissioners court. The director may hire additional employees subject to the approval of the commissioners court. The director must execute a bond with a solvent surety company authorized to execute bonds of this type in the state. The bond shall be payable to the county judge and conditioned on the director's faithful performance of his duties and on the director properly accounting for any funds entrusted to him. The commissioners court shall set the amount of the bond and shall pay the premium for the bond out of the general funds of the county.

(d) The director or the director's agent or the county officer designated to create an office of child support within the county officer's department or the county officer's agent shall receive the payments made under this section. The director or the director's agent or the county officer designated to create an office of child support within the county officer's department or the county officer's agent shall disburse the funds in the manner the district court determines to be in the best interests of the parties involved in the case and in accordance with departmental policies as approved by the commissioners court.

(e) The director or the county officer designated to create an office of child support within the county officer's department or the county officer's agent shall keep an accurate and complete record of all receipts and disbursements of funds under this section. The county auditor shall inspect the record, audit the accounts annually, and make a report of the auditor's findings and recommendations to the commissioners court.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 5.01(f)(2), eff. January 1, 2022.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 5.01(f)(2), eff. January 1, 2022.

(h) Each year the commissioners court may set aside an amount equal to not more than four percent of the amount of fees collected under this section during the previous year to provide self-insurance for errors and omissions.

(i) The commissioners court may contract with a private entity to provide any part of the services this section authorizes the department to provide or, in lieu of establishing the child support department, may contract with a private entity to provide all of the services this section authorizes the department to provide.

(j) If the commissioners court contracts with a private entity to collect or disburse support payments or the fee prescribed by this section, the commissioners court shall require the entity to keep accurate and complete records of all receipts and disbursements. The entity shall permit the county auditor to inspect the entity's records and audit the accounts annually. The commissioners court shall also require the entity to execute a surety bond. The bond must be similar to the bond required by Subsection (c), but the commissioners court may not pay the premium for the bond.

(k) If the commissioners court designates a county officer to create an office of child support within the county officer's department, the county officer shall serve as the director of the child support department. The county officer may hire additional employees subject to the approval of the commissioners court. The county officer must execute a bond with a solvent surety company authorized to execute bonds of this type in this state. The bond shall be payable to the county judge and conditioned on the county officer's faithful performance of the duties entrusted to him under this section and on the county officer's properly accounting for any funds entrusted to him. The commissioners court shall set the amount of the bond and shall pay the premium for the bond out of the general funds of the county.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 12.06(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 364, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 7.51, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 5.01(f)(2), eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 152.1076. CERTIFICATE OF INDEBTEDNESS FOR FACILITIES. (a) Certificates of indebtedness issued and sold by the commissioners court of Harris County to acquire property and to construct, enlarge, furnish, equip, and repair buildings used as homes and schools for delinquent children that have been submitted to the attorney general, approved by the attorney general, and registered by the comptroller are incontestable.

(b) The certificates are legal and authorized investments for:

(1) banks;

(2) savings banks;

(3) trust companies;

(4) savings and loan associations;

(5) insurance companies;

(6) fiduciaries;

(7) trustees;

(8) guardians; and

(9) sinking funds of municipalities, counties, school districts, and other political subdivisions of the state and other public funds of the state and its agencies.

(c) The certificates are eligible to secure deposits of public funds of the state and of municipalities, counties, school districts, and other political subdivisions of the state. The certificates are lawful and sufficient security for deposits to the extent of their market or face value, whichever is less, if accompanied by all unmatured coupons.

(d) The commissioners court shall continue to levy a tax that is sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the certificates so long as certificates are outstanding.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1081. HARRISON COUNTY. (a) The Harrison County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Harrison County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court. The additional compensation is for the added duties imposed on the members and shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation officer.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Harrison County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1091. HARTLEY COUNTY. (a) The Hartley County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Hartley County, and the judge of any statutory court designated as a juvenile court.

(b) The board shall hold regular meetings each year on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(c) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(d) The board may cooperate with other juvenile boards to provide adequate services.

(e) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members a salary in an amount set by the commissioners court.

(f) The chief juvenile probation officer may appoint necessary personnel with the approval of the board and with the advice and consent of the commissioners court.

(g) The juvenile board shall use the juvenile probation fund to pay as much of the salaries and allowances and other necessary expenses as possible. The commissioners court shall pay the other salaries, allowances, and necessary expenses from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(h) The board may accept aid, grants, or gifts from the state, other political subdivisions of the state, or associations for the sole purpose of financing adequate and effective probation programs. A municipality may grant and allocate money to the county government or to the juvenile board to support and maintain juvenile programs if the municipality's governing body approves the expenditure. The fiscal officer shall deposit funds received under this subsection in a special account.

(i) If approved by the commissioners court, the county shall reimburse each juvenile board member for the member's reasonable and necessary job-related expenses. Reimbursable expenses include travel, lodging, training, and educational activities.

(j) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005(a) and (b), and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the Hartley County Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1101. HASKELL COUNTY. (a) Haskell County is included in the 39th Judicial District Juvenile Board. The juvenile board is composed of:

(1) the county judge of Haskell County;

(2) the county judge of Kent County;

(3) the county judge of Stonewall County;

(4) the county judge of Throckmorton County; and

(5) the 39th Judicial District judge.

(b) The juvenile court judge may appoint two public members to serve on the board for a term set by the judge.

(c) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(d) The commissioners court of each county shall pay the county judge of that county and the 39th Judicial District judge additional annual compensation of not more than $6,000, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county, for the added duties imposed on the judges under this section. The public members serve without compensation.

(e) If approved by the juvenile board, the commissioners court shall reimburse the juvenile court judge for the judge's actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending seminars and other educational or instructional meetings related to juvenile problems. The counties shall prorate the expenses allowed for the members of the juvenile board and for the juvenile court judge.

(f) The commissioners court of each county shall jointly provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries of the juvenile probation personnel in the amount set by the juvenile board.

(g) The commissioners court of each county shall jointly pay the expenses of the juvenile probation officers that are certified as necessary by the juvenile board chairman from the general fund and in the amount set by the juvenile board.

(h) Sections 152.0004 and 152.0005(b) do not apply to the juvenile board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 65 (S.B. 1811), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 152.1111. HAYS COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Hays County is composed of the county judge, the district judge of the 22nd judicial district, the judges of the county court at law, the county sheriff, and the criminal district attorney.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation in an amount determined by the commissioners court. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Hays County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 709, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 152.1121. HEMPHILL COUNTY. (a) The Hemphill County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Hemphill County.

(b) The juvenile board shall select one of its members to act as chairman.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional compensation in an amount that will reasonably compensate them for their added duties. The board members shall receive the same compensation.

(d) The commissioners court shall reimburse the juvenile board members for the members' actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing their duties.

(e) The juvenile board shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Hemphill County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1131. HENDERSON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Henderson County is composed of:

(1) the county judge;

(2) the judges of the 3rd, 173rd, and 392nd judicial districts;

(3) the judges of the county courts at law; and

(4) the county attorney.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at its first regular meeting of each fiscal year.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the 173rd and 392nd district judges and the county court at law judges an amount set by the commissioners court at not less than $750 a month and shall pay the 3rd district judge an amount set by the commissioners court at not less than one-third of the amount paid to the 173rd or 392nd district judge or the county court at law judges. The commissioners court shall pay the other juvenile board members an amount set by the commissioners court at not less than $250 a month. The compensation is in addition to other compensation provided or allowed by law.

(d) The county attorney shall file, prosecute, and try on behalf of the state all juvenile cases in the juvenile court. A district attorney with jurisdiction in Henderson County shall act for the county attorney at the request of the juvenile court judge if the county attorney is ill or unable to perform his duties.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Henderson County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 332, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 377, Sec. 3(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 152.1141. HIDALGO COUNTY. (a) The Hidalgo County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Hidalgo County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not more than $8,000 for the added duties imposed on the members. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) The commissioners court may reimburse the juvenile court judge for the judge's actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending seminars and other educational or instructional meetings relating to juvenile matters. The annual amount for which the judge may be reimbursed may not exceed $600.

(d) The juvenile board may require a board employee to enter into a bond payable to the board, conditioned on the faithful performance of the person's duties. The board shall pay the premium of the bond. The board may suspend or remove an employee for good cause.

(e) The commissioners court shall provide the juvenile probation officers with:

(1) automobiles and their maintenance and operation for use in official duties; or

(2) an automobile allowance in the amount the commissioners court determines to be necessary for use of a personal automobile on official business.

(f) The board shall control and supervise each county facility used to train, educate, detain, support, or correct juveniles. The board shall appoint the superintendent of each institution.

(g) The board may accept gifts or grants of real or personal property subject to the terms and conditions of the gift or grant to use for the benefit of the juvenile justice system.

(h) The board shall submit an annual budget to the county commissioners court. The commissioners court may appropriate and the juvenile board shall use money from the county general fund to administer this section.

(i) The board may authorize the use of foster homes for the temporary care of a child alleged to be a child in need of supervision or a delinquent child or a child that is dependent or neglected.

(j) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(b) do not apply to the juvenile board of Hidalgo County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1142. HIDALGO COUNTY COURT CONFERENCE COMMITTEE. (a) A law enforcement officer in Hidalgo County may refer to the court conference committee a child who:

(1) has been charged with a Class C misdemeanor (first offense only);

(2) is a status offender; or

(3) is a truant or runaway.

(b) This section does not affect:

(1) the authority of a law enforcement officer under Title 3, Family Code; or

(2) the duty of a law enforcement officer to report a case to a state or local child protective services agency.

(c) In this section:

(1) "Child" has the meaning assigned by Section 51.02, Family Code.

(2) "Court conference committee" means the county juvenile probation program's court conference committee.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 527, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Sec. 152.1151. HILL COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Hill County is composed of the county judge, the statutory county court judges, and the district judges in Hill County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not more than $2,400 as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Hill County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 959 (H.B. 1622), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 152.1161. HOCKLEY COUNTY. (a) The Hockley County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judge in Hockley County, the judge of any statutory court designated as a juvenile court in the county, and the juvenile court referee, if any. Subject to approval by the commissioners court, the chairman shall appoint five public members to serve on the board for a period of two years. A public member may be reappointed to the board.

(b) The county judge is the chairman of the juvenile board. The district judge is the vice-chairman and acts as chairman if:

(1) the chairman is absent or disabled; or

(2) the office of county judge is vacant.

(c) The board shall hold regular meetings at least annually on dates set by the board and shall hold special meetings at the call of the chairman. All meetings shall be held at a site in Hockley County.

(d) The commissioners court shall pay the judges on the juvenile board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $600, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county. Public members serve without compensation.

(e) The commissioners court may reimburse a juvenile board member for the member's reasonable and necessary job-related expenses. Reimbursable expenses include travel, lodging, training, and educational activities.

(f) The juvenile board shall pay the salaries of juvenile probation personnel and other expenses the chairman certifies as essential to provide services to the children of Hockley County from the juvenile board fund to the extent of the state aid received in the fund. The salaries approved by the commissioners court may be paid from funds received for that purpose from the Texas Juvenile Justice Department. The commissioners court shall pay the remaining approved salaries of juvenile probation personnel and other expenses certified as necessary by the juvenile board chairman from the general funds of the county.

(g) The chairman of the juvenile board shall certify to the commissioners court an annual request for the expenditure of county funds. The commissioners court shall act on the request in the same manner as it acts on a request from another county office.

(h) The county auditor shall serve as the board's fiscal officer.

(i) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Hockley County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 513, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 476, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 129, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 152.1182. COMPENSATION OF JUVENILE COURT JUDGE. (a) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile court judge of Hopkins County an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $2,400 nor more than $3,600 for serving as juvenile court judge.

(b) The compensation is in addition to any other compensation the judge receives and is payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund, salary fund, or any other available fund of the county.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1191. HOUSTON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Houston County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Houston County, the county attorney, and each county court at law judge.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $50 nor more than $250 a month as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members.

(d) The county attorney shall file, prosecute, and try on behalf of the state all juvenile cases in the juvenile court. The district attorney shall act for the county attorney if the county attorney is ill, absent, or otherwise unable to perform his duties.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Houston County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 536, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 152.1201. HOWARD COUNTY. (a) Howard County is included in the 118th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0931 applies to the 118th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1211. HUDSPETH COUNTY. (a) The Culberson-Hudspeth Counties Juvenile Board is composed of the county judges and the district judges in Culberson and Hudspeth counties.

(b) Section 152.0611 applies to the Culberson-Hudspeth Counties Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1221. HUNT COUNTY. (a) The Hunt County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Hunt County, and the judges of the county courts at law.

(b) The board shall designate a juvenile court judge as the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the members of the juvenile board additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not more than $3,600 for the added duties imposed on the members. The commissioners court may pay the juvenile court clerk additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not more than $800. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county. The compensation is in addition to all other compensation provided or allowed by law for the clerk of the juvenile court.

(d) Each judge on the board may appoint one citizen to serve on the advisory council. Members of the advisory council serve without compensation.

(e) A member of the advisory council is not liable in civil damages or for criminal prosecution for an action taken by the juvenile board.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Hunt County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1103 (H.B. 4833), Sec. 13(b), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 152.1231. HUTCHINSON COUNTY. (a) The Hutchinson County Juvenile Board is composed of:

(1) the county judge and the district judges in Hutchinson County;

(2) one member appointed by the Hutchinson County Commissioners Court; and

(3) one member appointed by the Borger Bar Association.

(b) The appointed members serve one-year terms.

(c) The judge of the 316th Judicial District is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(d) The members of the juvenile board serve without compensation.

(e) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation officer.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Hutchinson County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1241. IRION COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Irion County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Irion County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not more than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Irion County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1251. JACK COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board in Jack and Wise counties is composed of the county judges, the district judges in Jack and Wise counties, and the judge of each statutory county court in the counties that is designated as a juvenile court.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(c) The commissioners courts shall pay the members of the juvenile board an annual salary in an amount set by the commissioners courts, payable in equal monthly installments out of the general funds or any other available funds of the counties.

(d) Unless the counties agree on a different method of allocating costs, each county shall pay the costs of the juvenile board in accordance with the ratio that the population of the county bears to the total population of the two counties.

(e) Section 152.0005(b) does not apply to the juvenile board in Jack and Wise counties.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1261. JACKSON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Jackson County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Jackson County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members reasonable additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The compensation may not be lower than the compensation paid to a member on August 29, 1977. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Jackson County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1271. JASPER COUNTY. (a) Jasper County is included in the East Texas Juvenile Board. The juvenile board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Jasper, Newton, Sabine, or San Augustine County.

(b) The judge of the 1st Judicial District is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer. The juvenile board shall elect a county judge on the board to serve as vice-chairman.

(c) The Commissioners Court of Jasper County may pay the county judge of Jasper County additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court.

(d) The commissioners courts of the counties included on the board may pay the district judges on the board additional annual compensation in an amount set by a majority of the county commissioners of the four counties. The commissioners court of each county shall pay the compensation to the district judges in accordance with the ratio that the population of the county bears to the total population of the four counties.

(e) The compensation paid to the county and district judges is for the added duties imposed on the judges and shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the counties.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the East Texas Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1281. JEFF DAVIS COUNTY. (a) The Jeff Davis County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Jeff Davis County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $3,600 as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Jeff Davis County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1291. JEFFERSON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Jefferson County is composed of the county judge and the district and criminal district judges in Jefferson County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the county judge on the juvenile board additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not more than $5,000 as compensation for the administrative and judicial services performed by the judge. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The juvenile board may require a juvenile probation officer or facility superintendent to obtain a surety or personal bond in an amount determined by the board, conditioned on the faithful performance of the person's duties, and approved by the board.

(e) The juvenile board may suspend or remove a juvenile probation officer at any time for good cause. The chief probation officer, with the approval of the board, may suspend or remove an assistant probation officer for good cause after the assistant is notified and afforded an opportunity to appear before the board.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Jefferson County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1292. JEFFERSON COUNTY INSTITUTIONS. (a) The juvenile board of Jefferson County controls and supervises each county facility used for the detention of juveniles.

(b) The juvenile board by majority vote may adopt any order or regulation necessary to the welfare of juveniles in a county facility. The chief juvenile probation officer shall enter each order or regulation in a book kept for that purpose and shall certify the order or regulation and deliver a copy to each facility superintendent or person in charge of a facility. The superintendent or other person and each juvenile probation officer shall comply with the order or regulation.

(c) The juvenile board may require the superintendent or person in charge of a facility to submit to the board reports containing information required by the board.

(d) The district attorney of Jefferson County shall assign an attorney in the district attorney's office to represent the juvenile board and probation officers in protecting the rights of children in abandonment cases and proceedings.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1293. COLLECTION AND DISBURSEMENT OF SUPPORT PAYMENTS IN JEFFERSON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Jefferson County may require a juvenile probation officer to collect and disburse child support payments that are required by court order to be made to a court in the county.

(b) The juvenile probation officer shall keep a record of money received and disbursed in a well-bound book in the probation office. The payment book is open to public inspection. The county auditor shall audit the records.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1301. JIM HOGG COUNTY. (a) The Jim Hogg County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judge in Jim Hogg County, and a citizen of Jim Hogg County appointed by the county judge and the district judge. The citizen member of the board serves the same term of office as the district judge in Jim Hogg County.

(b) The district judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 or more than $3,600 for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The juvenile board shall appoint not more than five persons to serve on an advisory council.

(e) The Jim Hogg County Juvenile Board and the juvenile boards of one or more counties that are adjacent to or in close proximity to Jim Hogg County may agree to operate together with respect to all matters, or with respect to certain matters specified by the juvenile boards. Juvenile boards operating together may appoint one fiscal officer to receive and disburse funds for the boards.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 35, eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 22(a), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 152.1321. JOHNSON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Johnson County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Johnson County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court. The additional compensation is for the added duties imposed on the members and is payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Johnson County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1076, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1331. JONES COUNTY. (a) The Jones County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Jones County, and the judge of each statutory court designated as a juvenile court. The juvenile court judge may appoint one public member to serve on the board for a term set by the judge.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the judges on the board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $5,000, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county. The public member serves without compensation.

(d) The chief juvenile probation officer may set the salaries and allowances of juvenile probation personnel with the approval of the board.

(e) Section 152.0005(b) does not apply to the juvenile board of Jones County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1341. KARNES COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Karnes County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Karnes County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $4,800 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Karnes County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1351. KAUFMAN COUNTY. (a) The Kaufman County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the judges of the county courts at law of Kaufman County, the district judges in Kaufman County, and the criminal district attorney.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation of not more than $600 for the added duties imposed on the members. The compensation is in addition to all other compensation paid to a board member by the state or county and shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The juvenile probation officer's expenses are payable on a voucher signed by the board chairman. The commissioners court shall pay the officer's salary and expenses from the general fund of the county.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Kaufman County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 222, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 776 (H.B. 3547), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 152.1361. KENDALL COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Kendall County is composed of the county judge, the judge of the county court at law, and the district judges in Kendall County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $600 nor more than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Kendall County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 138, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 152.1371. KENEDY COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Kenedy County is composed of the judges of the county and district courts in the county. The board must have not fewer than three nor more than five members. The judges of the county and district courts in the county may appoint an appropriate number of public members to serve on the board without compensation if necessary to satisfy this requirement. The chairman of the board shall determine the number of public members to be appointed to the board.

(b) The county judge is the chairman of the board.

(c) The board shall hold biannual meetings on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(d) Service on a juvenile board by a judge is an additional duty of office. The commissioners court shall pay the judges on the juvenile board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $6,000, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(e) The county shall reimburse a juvenile board member for the member's actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing the member's duties.

(f) The juvenile board shall ensure that the chief juvenile officer and fiscal officer:

(1) keep the financial and statistical records and submit reports to the Texas Juvenile Justice Department as prescribed by Section 221.007; and

(2) submit periodic financial and statistical reports to the county commissioners court.

(g) The chief juvenile probation officer shall appoint an appropriate number of qualified juvenile probation officers, assistants, and support personnel with the approval of the board as necessary to perform his duties. The chief juvenile probation officer and the personnel appointed under this section may be removed at any time by the appointing authority or by the juvenile board. The chief juvenile probation officer shall recommend to the juvenile board the salaries of and allowances for juvenile probation officers, assistants, and support personnel. The juvenile board shall provide the chief juvenile probation officer and his assistants with transportation or an automobile allowance for use of a personal automobile on official business.

(h) A claim for expenses from a person in the juvenile probation department must be made to the board chairman. The chairman shall certify to the fiscal officer the expenses to be paid from state funds and shall certify to the commissioners court the expenses to be paid from county funds.

(i) The chairman of the board shall certify to the commissioners court an annual request for the expenditure of county funds. The commissioners court shall act on the request in the same manner as it acts on a request from another county office.

(j) The board may accept state aid and grants and gifts from other political subdivisions of the state or associations for the purpose of financing adequate and effective juvenile programs. A municipality may grant and allocate money to the juvenile board to support and maintain effective juvenile services if the municipality's governing body approves the expenditure. Funds received under this subsection shall be administered and kept separately from other public funds. This section does not affect a program of local enrichment of juvenile services funded by a service.

(k) The juvenile board shall appoint an advisory council of not more than five persons.

(l) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0008, and 152.0009 do not apply to the juvenile board of Kenedy County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 3.020, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 152.1381. KENT COUNTY. (a) Kent County is included in the 39th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.1101 applies to the 39th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 65 (S.B. 1811), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 152.1391. KERR COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Kerr County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Kerr County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $600 nor more than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Kerr County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1401. KIMBLE COUNTY. (a) The Kimble County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Kimble County.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman.

(c) The juvenile board shall hold regular annual meetings on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(d) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members an annual salary of not less than $600, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county. The commissioners court may increase the compensation at any time.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005(b), and 152.0006 do not apply to the juvenile board of Kimble County.

(f) The Kimble County Juvenile Board and the juvenile boards of one or more counties that are adjacent to or in close proximity to Kimble County may agree to operate together. Juvenile boards operating together may appoint one fiscal officer to receive and disburse funds for the boards.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 913 (S.B. 1322), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 152.1411. KING COUNTY. (a) King County is included in the 50th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0181 applies to the 50th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1421. KINNEY COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Kinney County is composed of the county judge and district judges in Kinney County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $3,600, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Kinney County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1431. KLEBERG COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Kleberg County is composed of the judges of the county and district courts in the county. The board must have not fewer than three nor more than five members. The judges of the county and district courts in the county may appoint an appropriate number of public members to serve on the board without compensation if necessary to satisfy this requirement. The chairman of the board shall determine the number of public members to be appointed to the board.

(b) The county judge is the chairman of the board.

(c) The board shall hold biannual meetings on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(d) Service on a juvenile board by a judge is an additional duty of office. The commissioners court shall pay the judges on the juvenile board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $6,000, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(e) The county shall reimburse a juvenile board member for the member's actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing the member's duties.

(f) The juvenile board shall ensure that the chief juvenile officer and fiscal officer:

(1) keep the financial and statistical records and submit reports to the Texas Juvenile Justice Department as prescribed by Section 221.007; and

(2) submit periodic financial and statistical reports to the county commissioners court.

(g) The chief juvenile probation officer shall appoint an appropriate number of qualified juvenile probation officers, assistants, and support personnel with the approval of the board as necessary to perform his duties. The chief juvenile probation officer and the personnel appointed under this section may be removed at any time by the appointing authority or by the juvenile board. The chief juvenile probation officer shall recommend to the juvenile board the salaries of and allowances for juvenile probation officers, assistants, and support personnel. The juvenile board shall provide the chief juvenile probation officer and his assistants with transportation or an automobile allowance for use of a personal automobile on official business.

(h) A claim for expenses from a person in the juvenile probation department must be made to the board chairman. The chairman shall certify to the fiscal officer the expenses to be paid from state funds and shall certify to the commissioners court the expenses to be paid from county funds.

(i) The chairman of the board shall certify to the commissioners court an annual request for the expenditure of county funds. The commissioners court shall act on the request in the same manner as it acts on a request from another county office.

(j) The board may accept state aid and grants and gifts from other political subdivisions of the state or associations for the purpose of financing adequate and effective juvenile programs. A municipality may grant and allocate money to the juvenile board to support and maintain effective juvenile services if the municipality's governing body approves the expenditure. Funds received under this subsection shall be administered and kept separately from other public funds. This section does not affect a program of local enrichment of juvenile services funded by a service.

(k) The juvenile board shall appoint an advisory council of not more than five persons.

(l) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0008, and 152.0009 do not apply to the juvenile board of Kleberg County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 3.021, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 152.1441. KNOX COUNTY. (a) Knox County is included in the 50th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0181 applies to the 50th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1451. LAMAR COUNTY. (a) The Lamar County Juvenile Board is composed of:

(1) the county judge;

(2) the statutory county court at law judge;

(3) the district judges in Lamar County; and

(4) one member of the commissioners court selected by and from among the members of the commissioners court.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at its first regular meeting of each fiscal year. The board shall hold regular meetings each year on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(c) Service on a juvenile board by a judge is an additional duty of office. The commissioners court may pay the board chairman and other board members additional annual compensation for the additional duties imposed on the chairman and the other board members. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) The juvenile board shall recommend to the commissioners court proposed salaries for juvenile probation officers and other juvenile probation employees. The commissioners court shall set the salaries of juvenile probation officers and other juvenile probation employees after considering the recommendation of the juvenile board and any other relevant factors, including the source of funds, the duties and workload of the employees, and the effect on other county employees. The commissioners court shall comply with all applicable laws when setting the salaries of juvenile probation officers and other juvenile probation employees.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Lamar County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1392, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 152.1461. LAMB COUNTY. (a) The Lamb County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Lamb County, and the judge of any statutory court designated as a juvenile court. The juvenile court judge may appoint three public members to serve on the board for a term set by the judge.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the judges on the board an annual salary in an amount set by the commissioners court, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county. The public members serve without compensation.

(d) Section 152.0005(b) does not apply to the juvenile board of Lamb County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1471. LAMPASAS COUNTY. (a) The Lampasas County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Lampasas County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary of not more than $600 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Lampasas County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1481. LA SALLE COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of La Salle County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in La Salle County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $4,800 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of La Salle County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1491. LAVACA COUNTY. (a) The Lavaca County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Lavaca County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional monthly compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $100 nor more than $400 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salary and expenses of the juvenile probation officer.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Lavaca County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1511. LEON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Leon County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Leon County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 annually, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Leon County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 531 (H.B. 956), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1152 (H.B. 3045), Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1059 (H.B. 3153), Sec. 1.01(d), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 152.1521. LIBERTY COUNTY. (a) The Liberty County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and at least two citizens of Liberty County appointed by the county judge with the approval of the commissioners court. The juvenile probation officer may be appointed as a public member. The public members serve two-year terms.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court. The additional compensation is for the added duties imposed on the members and shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other appropriate fund of the county. The compensation paid to the public members is in addition to any other salary received by a public member. If the juvenile probation officer serves as a public member, the officer may not receive additional compensation for serving on the board.

(c) The commissioners court shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer and the officer's assistants as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation officer and the officer's assistants.

(d) The county judge shall serve as the judge of the juvenile court.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Liberty County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1541. LIPSCOMB COUNTY. (a) The Lipscomb County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Lipscomb County.

(b) The juvenile board shall select one of its members to act as chairman.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional compensation in an amount that will reasonably compensate them for their added duties. The board members shall receive the same compensation.

(d) The commissioners court shall reimburse the juvenile board members for the members' actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing their duties.

(e) The juvenile board shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Lipscomb County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1551. LIVE OAK COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Live Oak County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Live Oak County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation may not be lower than the amount paid to the judges on September 1, 1981.

(c) The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Live Oak County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1561. LLANO COUNTY. (a) The Llano County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Llano County.

(b) The judge of the 33rd District Court is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $1,200 as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Llano County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 152.1581. LUBBOCK COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Lubbock County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Lubbock County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the county judge additional annual compensation of $1,500, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county. The commissioners court may pay each district judge an annual salary of not less than $6,500, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county. The commissioners court shall pay the members an additional $75 per month for performing the additional duties prescribed by Sections 152.1582 and 152.1583.

(c) The juvenile board shall hold meetings at least once every three months in accordance with board rules.

(d) The board shall keep records as required by law and board rules.

(e) A juvenile probation officer shall take the oath of office when appointed and the oath and the fact of the appointment shall be filed with the county clerk.

(f) The juvenile board may require a juvenile probation officer or facility superintendent to obtain a surety or personal bond in an amount determined by the board and conditioned on the faithful performance of the person's duties.

(g) The juvenile board may suspend or remove a juvenile probation officer at any time for good cause. The chief probation officer, with the approval of the board, may suspend or remove an assistant probation officer for good cause after the assistant is notified and afforded an opportunity to appear before the board.

(h) Sections 152.0002, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Lubbock County.

(i) The juvenile board of Lubbock County and the juvenile boards of one or more counties that are adjacent to or in close proximity to Lubbock County may agree to operate together with respect to all matters, or with respect to certain matters specified by the juvenile boards. Juvenile boards operating together may appoint one fiscal officer to receive and disburse funds for the boards.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 82 (S.B. 511), Sec. 2, eff. May 24, 2021.

Sec. 152.1582. LUBBOCK COUNTY INSTITUTIONS. (a) The juvenile board of Lubbock County controls and supervises each county facility used for the detention of juveniles.

(b) The juvenile board by majority vote may adopt any order or regulation necessary to the welfare of juveniles in a county facility. The chief juvenile probation officer shall enter each order or regulation in a book kept for that purpose and shall certify the order or regulation and deliver a copy to each facility superintendent or person in charge of a facility. The superintendent or other person and each juvenile probation officer shall comply with the order or regulation.

(c) The juvenile board may require the superintendent or person in charge of a facility to submit to the board reports containing information required by the board.

(d) The district attorney of Lubbock County shall assign an attorney in the district attorney's office to represent the juvenile board and probation officers in protecting the rights of children in abandonment cases and proceedings.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1583. COLLECTION AND DISBURSEMENT OF SUPPORT PAYMENTS IN LUBBOCK COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Lubbock County may require a juvenile probation officer to collect and disburse child support payments that are required by court order to be made to a court in the county.

(b) The juvenile probation officer shall keep a record of money received and disbursed in a well-bound book subject to public inspection in the probation office. The county auditor shall audit the records.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1591. LYNN COUNTY. (a) The Lynn County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Lynn County, and the judge of each statutory court designated as a juvenile court. The juvenile court judge may appoint three public members to serve on the board for a term set by the judge.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(c) The juvenile board shall hold regular annual meetings each year on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(d) The commissioners court shall pay the judges on the board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county. The public members serve without compensation.

(e) The commissioners court shall pay the salaries and allowances of juvenile probation personnel and other expenses certified as necessary by the board chairman and approved by the commissioners court from the general funds of the county.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, and 152.0005(b) do not apply to the juvenile board of Lynn County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1601. MCCULLOCH COUNTY. (a) The McCulloch County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in McCulloch County.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman.

(c) The juvenile board shall hold regular annual meetings on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(d) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members an annual salary of not less than $600, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county. The county commissioners court may increase the compensation at any time.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005(b), and 152.0006 do not apply to the juvenile board of McCulloch County.

(f) The McCulloch County Juvenile Board and the juvenile boards of one or more counties that are adjacent to or in close proximity to McCulloch County may agree to operate together. Juvenile boards operating together may appoint one fiscal officer to receive and disburse funds for the boards.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 913 (S.B. 1322), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 152.1611. MCLENNAN COUNTY. (a) The McLennan County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the county court at law judges, and the district judges in McLennan County.

(b) The juvenile board shall hold meetings at least once every three months in accordance with board rules.

(c) The board shall keep records as required by law and board rules.

(d) A juvenile probation officer shall take the oath of office when appointed and the oath and the fact of the appointment shall be filed with the county clerk.

(e) The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation personnel.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of McLennan County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 1976), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 956 (H.B. 4040), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 13.031, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 152.1612. COMPENSATION OF COUNTY, DISTRICT, AND COUNTY COURT AT LAW JUDGES. (a) The Commissioners Court of McLennan County shall annually supplement the salaries of the judges of the county and county court at law in an amount of not less than $1,500 nor more than $5,000 for services rendered to the juvenile board of McLennan County. The supplement is in addition to all other salary paid or authorized to be paid by the state to the judges of the county and county court at law.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the district judges in the county an annual salary of not less than $1,500 for services rendered to the juvenile board. The salary is in addition to the supplemental salary paid to the judges under Section 32.155(a), Government Code.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1613. MCLENNAN COUNTY JUVENILE BOARD LOCAL ENRICHMENT PROGRAM. The McLennan County Juvenile Board may establish and administer a local enrichment of juvenile services program consistent with policies adopted by the juvenile board.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1193 (H.B. 3829), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 152.1614. GIFT, GRANT, OR DONATION TO MCLENNAN COUNTY JUVENILE BOARD. (a) The McLennan County Juvenile Board may accept a gift, grant, or donation from a public or private source for any lawful purpose, including support of a local enrichment of juvenile services program.

(b) The juvenile board shall place a donation of money under Subsection (a) in a special fund that is:

(1) subject to all reporting or procedural requirements of the county auditor; and

(2) audited annually by the county auditor.

(c) Notwithstanding Subsection (b), the juvenile board is not required to establish or adopt a budget for expenditures under the special fund described by this section.

(d) The special fund described by Subsection (b) may be used only to pay expenses of and related to programs, services, and items approved by the juvenile board.

(e) An expenditure from the special fund described by Subsection (b) must comply with the requirements of Chapter 262, Local Government Code, that apply to the juvenile board's other expenditures.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1193 (H.B. 3829), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 152.1621. MCMULLEN COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of McMullen County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in McMullen County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation may not be lower than the amount paid to the judges on September 1, 1981.

(c) The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of McMullen County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1631. MADISON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Madison County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Madison County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 annually, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Madison County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1152 (H.B. 3045), Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 152.1641. MARION COUNTY. (a) Marion County is included in the Camp, Marion, Morris, and Titus Counties Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0381 applies to the Camp, Marion, Morris, and Titus Counties Juvenile Board.

(c) Section 152.1612 is suspended while Marion County is a member of the Camp, Marion, Morris, and Titus Counties Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1642. MARION COUNTY. (a) The Marion County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judges and the district judges in Marion County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $600 nor more than $1,200 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation officer.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Marion County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1651. MARTIN COUNTY. (a) Martin County is included in the 118th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0931 applies to the 118th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1661. MASON COUNTY. (a) The Mason County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Mason County.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members an annual salary of not less than $600, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county. The commissioners court may increase the compensation at any time.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005(b), and 152.0006 do not apply to the juvenile board of Mason County.

(e) The juvenile board shall hold regular annual meetings on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(f) The Mason County Juvenile Board and the juvenile boards of one or more counties that are adjacent to or in close proximity to Mason County may agree to operate together. Juvenile boards operating together may appoint one fiscal officer to receive and disburse funds for the boards.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 913 (S.B. 1322), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 152.1671. MATAGORDA COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Matagorda County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Matagorda County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the board members annual additional compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Matagorda County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 771, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 152.1672. COMPENSATION OF JUVENILE JUDGE IN MATAGORDA COUNTY. (a) The Commissioners Court of Matagorda County may pay the juvenile judge additional annual compensation of not more than $1,500 for serving as the judge of the juvenile court.

(b) The compensation is in addition to all other compensation paid or authorized to be paid to the judge who serves as the juvenile judge.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1673. MATAGORDA COUNTY CHILD SUPPORT OFFICE. (a) The judges of the district courts in Matagorda County may establish a child support office in the county juvenile office to collect and disburse child support payments that are required by court order to be made to the office. The office shall disburse the payments in the manner the court believes to be in the best interest of the parties in the case.

(b) The judges of the district courts in a county served by an office may appoint an administrator and other assistants to serve two-year terms. The administrator shall obtain a surety bond in an amount determined by the county auditor from a solvent surety company authorized to make the bonds in this state and approved by the county auditor. The bond shall be conditioned on the faithful performance of the administrator's duties and on the proper accounting of the money entrusted to the administrator. The county shall pay the premium for the bond from the general fund of the county, the child support fund, or any other available fund.

(c) The judges shall determine the duties of the administrator and assistants and set their salaries. The salaries are payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county, the child support fund, or any other available fund. The judges must approve a claim for expenses made by the administrator or an assistant or a claim for administrative expenses in operating the child support office, including a claim for payment of equipment and supplies.

(d) The office shall keep an accurate and complete record of money received and disbursed under this section. The record is open for public inspection. The county auditor or other authorized county officer or employee shall inspect and examine the records and audit the accounts quarterly. The auditor shall report the results of the audit to the judges and include any recommendations the auditor may have.

(e) The child support office may serve one or more of Brazoria, Fort Bend, and Wharton counties. If a child support office serves more than one county, the judges of the district courts in the counties shall determine the location of the office. The officers and employees of the county in which the office is located shall perform the duties prescribed by this section. The counties shall pay the salaries, bond premium, and other expenses in accordance with the ratio that the population of each county bears to the total population of all of the counties served by the office.

(f) The commissioners courts shall pay the district court judges $75 a month for performing the duties prescribed by this section. The compensation shall be paid from the general fund of the county and is in addition to any other compensation the judges receive.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1674. MATAGORDA COUNTY CHILD SUPPORT SERVICE FEE. (a) The Matagorda County child support office shall assess a monthly fee of not more than $10 for collecting and disbursing child support payments that are required by court order to be made to the office. The fee is payable annually and in advance.

(b) The payor of the support shall pay the fee unless the payor is a member of the armed services and the monthly child support payments exceed the amount the court orders the person to pay, in which case the payee shall pay the service fee for as long as the payor is a member of the armed services and the support payments exceed the amount the court orders the person to pay.

(c) The first fee payment is due on the date that the payor is ordered to begin the child support payments. If the payee must pay the fee, the first fee payment is due on the date that the payee receives the original support payment. Subsequent annual fees are due on the anniversary of the date of the original fee payment.

(d) A person who refuses or fails to pay the fee on the date due or in the amount ordered is subject to an action for contempt of court.

(e) Fees collected under this section shall be paid to the county treasurer on the last day of each calendar month. The county treasurer shall deposit the fees to the credit of the child support fund. The judges of the district courts in a county served by the office shall administer the fund, with the approval of the commissioners court, to assist in paying the salaries and expenses of the child support office.

(f) An accurate and complete record of money received under this section shall be kept. The county auditor or other authorized person shall audit the child support fund regularly. An annual report of the receipts and expenditures of the fund shall be made to the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 12.04(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 152.1691. MEDINA COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Medina County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Medina County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $3,600, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Medina County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 549, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 152.1701. MENARD COUNTY. (a) The Menard County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Menard County.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman.

(c) The juvenile board shall hold regular annual meetings on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(d) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members an annual salary of not less than $600, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county. The commissioners court may increase the compensation at any time.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005(b), and 152.0006 do not apply to the juvenile board of Menard County.

(f) The Menard County Juvenile Board and the juvenile boards of one or more counties that are adjacent to or in close proximity to Menard County may agree to operate together. Juvenile boards operating together may appoint one fiscal officer to receive and disburse funds for the boards.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 913 (S.B. 1322), Sec. 4, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 152.1711. MIDLAND COUNTY. (a) The Midland County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Midland County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation officer.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Midland County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1721. MILAM COUNTY. (a) Milam County is part of the Milam, Robertson, Falls Counties Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0791 applies to the Milam, Robertson, Falls Counties Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1741. MITCHELL COUNTY.

(a) Mitchell County is included in the 32nd Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.1831 applies to the 32nd Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 4(2), eff. October 1, 2017.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 4(2), eff. October 1, 2017.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 4(2), eff. October 1, 2017.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 4(2), eff. October 1, 2017.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 4(2), eff. October 1, 2017.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 97, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 2, eff. October 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 4(2), eff. October 1, 2017.

Sec. 152.1752. MONTAGUE COUNTY CHILD SUPPORT DIVISION. (a) The child support division in the Montague County Probation Department shall provide assistance to the district clerk in collecting child or spousal support payments. The division shall also assist in the enforcement of orders relating to the possession of or access to a child and may initiate contempt proceedings to enforce an order relating to the support and conservator orders.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 5.01(f)(4), eff. January 1, 2022.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 5.01(f)(4), eff. January 1, 2022.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 5.01(f)(4), eff. January 1, 2022.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 5.01(f)(4), eff. January 1, 2022.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 5.01(f)(4), eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 152.1753. MONTAGUE COUNTY PROBATION DEPARTMENT LEGAL OFFICER. The county attorney of Montague County is the legal officer for the Montague County Probation Department. If the county attorney fails, refuses, or declines to perform the duties, the probation board may appoint another suitable attorney as the legal officer.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1761. MONTGOMERY COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Montgomery County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Montgomery County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $3,000, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Section 152.0003 does not apply to the juvenile board of Montgomery County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 340, Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 1999.

Sec. 152.1771. MOORE COUNTY. (a) The Moore County Juvenile Board is composed of:

(1) the county judge; and

(2) six persons appointed by the Moore County Commissioners Court.

(b) The appointed members serve staggered two-year terms with the terms of three members expiring on December 31 of each even-numbered year, and the terms of three members expiring on December 31 of each odd-numbered year.

(c) The board shall select one of its members as chairman.

(d) The members serve without compensation.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Moore County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 767, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 152.1781. MORRIS COUNTY. (a) Morris County is included in the Camp, Marion, Morris, and Titus Counties Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0381 applies to the Camp, Marion, Morris, and Titus Counties Juvenile Board.

(c) Section 152.1782 is suspended while Morris County is a member of the Camp, Marion, Morris, and Titus Counties Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1782. MORRIS COUNTY. (a) The Morris County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Morris County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,800 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation officer.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the Morris County Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1791. MOTLEY COUNTY. (a) Motley County is included in the 110th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0291 applies to the 110th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1801. NACOGDOCHES COUNTY. (a) The Nacogdoches County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Nacogdoches County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation in an amount determined by the commissioners court for the added duties imposed on the members. The combined yearly salary from state and county sources received by each judge may not exceed an amount equal to $1,000 less than the combined yearly salary from state and county sources received by each justice of the court of appeals of the court of appeals district in which Nacogdoches County is located. The additional compensation is payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Nacogdoches County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1077, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1208, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 152.1811. NAVARRO COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Navarro County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Navarro County, the judges of the county courts at law in the county, and the criminal district attorney. The juvenile board may appoint five public members to serve on the board without salary for a term determined by the board.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $4,800, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) If approved by the juvenile board, the commissioners court may reimburse each juvenile court judge for the judge's actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending seminars and other educational or instructional meetings relating to juvenile matters.

(e) Section 152.0005(b) does not apply to the juvenile board of Navarro County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 5370), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 152.1812. ADDITIONAL COMPENSATION OF JUVENILE COURT JUDGE. (a) The Commissioners Court of Navarro County shall pay the district judge of the 13th Judicial District an annual salary of $4,000 for serving as the juvenile court judge.

(b) The salary is in addition to other compensation provided by law and paid by the state.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1821. NEWTON COUNTY. (a) Newton County is included in the East Texas Juvenile Board.

(b) Sections 152.1271(a), (b), (d), (e), and (f) apply to the juvenile board in Jasper, Newton, Sabine, and San Augustine counties.

(c) The Commissioners Court of Newton County may pay the county judge of Newton County additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1831. NOLAN COUNTY.

(a) Nolan County is included in the 32nd Judicial District Juvenile Board. The juvenile board is composed of the county judges, statutory county judges, and district judges in Fisher, Mitchell, and Nolan Counties.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of the members as chairman.

(c) The commissioners courts of the counties may pay the members of the juvenile board an annual supplemental compensation from the general fund or any other available fund of the counties.

(d) The juvenile board shall hold regular meetings on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, and 152.0005 do not apply to the juvenile board in Fisher, Mitchell, and Nolan counties.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 4(3), eff. October 1, 2017.

(g) The juvenile board shall designate the treasurer or auditor of Fisher County, Mitchell County, or Nolan County to serve as the board's fiscal officer.

(h) The juvenile board shall appoint an advisory council composed of one person from each county.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 246, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 3, eff. October 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1113 (H.B. 4280), Sec. 4(3), eff. October 1, 2017.

Sec. 152.1841. NUECES COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Nueces County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Nueces County, and the judge of the County Court at Law No. 5 of Nueces County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the board members annual additional compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $4,200 or more than $12,000 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation is in lieu of any other compensation provided by law for service on the juvenile board.

(c) The commissioners court shall provide the juvenile probation officers with:

(1) automobiles and their maintenance and operating expenses for use in official duties; or

(2) an automobile allowance for the use of a personal automobile on official business in the amount determined to be necessary by the commissioners court.

(d) The juvenile board may require a juvenile probation officer or institution superintendent to obtain a surety or personal bond conditioned on faithful performance of duty in an amount determined by the board.

(e) The juvenile board may suspend or remove a juvenile probation officer or an institution superintendent at any time for good cause. The chief probation officer, with the approval of the board, may suspend or remove an assistant probation officer for good cause after the assistant is notified and afforded an opportunity to appear before the board.

(f) The commissioners court shall provide necessary funds to maintain and operate the juvenile probation department.

(g) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Nueces County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1134, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 152.1842. NUECES COUNTY INSTITUTIONS. (a) The juvenile board of Nueces County controls and supervises each county facility used for the detention of juveniles.

(b) The juvenile board may adopt any order or regulation necessary to the welfare of juveniles in a county facility. The chief juvenile probation officer shall enter each order or regulation in a book kept for that purpose and shall certify the order or regulation and deliver a copy to each institution superintendent or person in charge of a facility. The superintendent or other person and each juvenile probation officer shall comply with the order or regulation.

(c) The juvenile board may require the superintendent or person in charge of a facility to submit to the board reports containing information required by the board.

(d) The district attorney of Nueces County shall assign an attorney in the district attorney's office to represent the juvenile board and probation officers in protecting the rights of children in abandonment cases and proceedings.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1843. COLLECTION AND DISBURSEMENT OF SUPPORT PAYMENTS IN NUECES COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Nueces County may require a juvenile probation officer to collect and disburse child support payments that are required by court order to be made to a court in the county.

(b) The juvenile probation officer shall keep a record of money received and disbursed in a well-bound book subject to public inspection in the probation office. The county auditor shall audit the records.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1871. ORANGE COUNTY. (a) The Orange County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Orange County, and the judge of any statutory county court.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court. The compensation paid to the judge of the county court at law may not exceed the compensation paid to the other members.

(c) The commissioners court may reimburse the juvenile court judge for the judge's actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending seminars and other educational or instructional meetings relating to juvenile matters.

(d) The juvenile board may require a board employee to enter into a bond payable to the board, conditioned on the faithful performance of the person's duties. The board shall pay the premium of the bond. The board may suspend or remove an employee for good cause.

(e) The board shall control and supervise each county institution used to detain juveniles. The board shall appoint the superintendent of each institution.

(f) The board shall set the fees and costs that relate to the programs or services the board administers.

(g) The board may accept gifts or grants of real or personal property subject to the terms and conditions of the gift or grant.

(h) The board shall submit an annual budget to the commissioners court. The commissioners court may appropriate and the juvenile board shall use money from the county general fund to administer this section.

(i) The board may authorize the use of foster homes for the temporary care of a child alleged to be a child in need of supervision or a delinquent child.

(j) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(b) do not apply to the Orange County Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1881. PALO PINTO COUNTY. (a) The Palo Pinto County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Palo Pinto County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary in an amount set by the commissioners court for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Palo Pinto County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1891. PANOLA COUNTY. (a) The Panola County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Panola County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not more than $1,800 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The commissioners court shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation officer.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Panola County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1901. PARKER COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Parker County is composed of the county judge, the statutory county court judges, and the district judges in Parker County.

(b) The judge of the 43rd Judicial District is the chairman of the board.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members an annual salary of not less than $6,000, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) The juvenile board shall appoint not more than four volunteers to serve on a citizen's advisory council. The advisory council shall meet with the juvenile board at the board's regular quarterly meetings and shall keep the board informed of current community issues relating to juveniles.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1306, Sec. 3(d), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 785 (H.B. 3993), Sec. 1, eff. October 1, 2007.

Sec. 152.1911. PARMER COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Bailey and Parmer counties is composed of the county judge, the district judges in the counties, and the judge of each statutory court designated as a juvenile court in the counties.

(b) Section 152.0151 applies to the juvenile board of Bailey and Parmer counties.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1921. PECOS COUNTY. (a) The Pecos County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Pecos County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $3,600 as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Pecos County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1931. POLK COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Polk County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Polk County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $3,000 nor more than $10,000, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county. The additional compensation paid to the judge of the county court at law may not exceed the amount paid to the other members of the board.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 of the general provisions subchapter do not apply to the juvenile board of Polk County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1941. POTTER COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Potter County is composed of the county judge, the district and family district judges in Potter County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The juvenile board shall hold meetings at least once every three months in accordance with board rules.

(c) The juvenile board members receive additional compensation as prescribed by Section 152.0053.

(d) The board shall keep records as required by law and board rules.

(e) A juvenile probation officer shall take the oath of office when appointed and the oath and the fact of the appointment shall be filed with the county clerk.

(f) The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation personnel.

(g) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Potter County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 595, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1951. PRESIDIO COUNTY. (a) The Presidio County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Presidio County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $3,600 as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Presidio County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1971. RANDALL COUNTY. (a) The Randall County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the county court at law judges, and the district judges in Randall County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $600 for the added duties imposed on the members. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0004 and 152.0005 do not apply to the juvenile board of Randall County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 322 (S.B. 672), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 152.1981. REAGAN COUNTY. (a) The Reagan County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Reagan County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $3,600 as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Reagan County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.1991. REAL COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Real County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Real County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $3,600, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Real County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2001. RED RIVER COUNTY. (a) The Red River County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in the county.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the members of the juvenile board additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 for the added duties imposed on the members. The compensation is payable in equal monthly installments out of the general funds of the county.

(c) The commissioners court may reimburse the juvenile court judge in the county for the judge's actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending seminars and other educational or instructional meetings relating to juvenile problems. Annual reimbursement provided to a judge under this subsection may not exceed $600.

(d) The commissioners court shall provide the funds for the salaries and reasonable expenses of the juvenile probation officers.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Red River County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 592, Sec. 2(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2021. REFUGIO COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Refugio County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Refugio County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members reasonable additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The compensation may not be lower than the compensation paid to a member on August 29, 1977. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Refugio County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2031. ROBERTS COUNTY. (a) The Roberts County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Roberts County.

(b) The juvenile board shall select one of its members to act as chairman.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional compensation in an amount that will reasonably compensate them for their added duties. The board members shall receive the same compensation.

(d) The commissioners court shall reimburse the juvenile board members for the members' actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing their duties.

(e) The juvenile board shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Roberts County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2041. ROBERTSON COUNTY. (a) Robertson County is part of the Milam, Robertson, Falls Counties Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0791 applies to the Milam, Robertson, Falls Counties Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2051. ROCKWALL COUNTY. (a) The Rockwall County Juvenile Board is composed of:

(1) the judges of the county courts at law in Rockwall County;

(2) the district judges in Rockwall County;

(3) one county commissioner appointed by the commissioners court;

(4) one member of the board of trustees of the Rockwall Independent School District selected by the board of trustees of the Rockwall Independent School District; and

(5) one member of the board of trustees of the Royse City Independent School District selected by the board of trustees of the Royse City Independent School District.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court. The compensation is for the added duties imposed on the members and shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Rockwall County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 953, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 652 (H.B. 3098), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 15.01, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 503 (H.B. 4568), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2021.

Sec. 152.2061. RUNNELS COUNTY. (a) The Runnels County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the judge of the 119th Judicial District, and the district attorney.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the board chairman additional annual compensation of not more than $600 for the added duties imposed on the chairman. The commissioners court may pay the other board members additional annual compensation of not more than $300. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county. The compensation is in addition to all other compensation provided or allowed for a district attorney.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Runnels County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2071. RUSK COUNTY. (a) The Rusk County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Rusk County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court. The additional compensation is for the added duties imposed on the members and shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The commissioners court may accept gifts, grants, or donations from other political subdivisions of the state, an organization, or other person for use in paying the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation officer. Funds received under this subsection shall be placed in a special fund.

(e) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation officer from the special fund or from the general fund.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Rusk County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2081. SABINE COUNTY. (a) Sabine County is included in the East Texas Juvenile Board.

(b) Sections 152.1271(a), (b), (d), (e), and (f) apply to the juvenile board in Jasper, Newton, Sabine, and San Augustine counties.

(c) The Commissioners Court of Sabine County may pay the county judge of Sabine County additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2091. SAN AUGUSTINE COUNTY. (a) San Augustine County is included in the East Texas Juvenile Board.

(b) Sections 152.1271(a), (b), (d), (e), and (f) apply to the juvenile board in Jasper, Newton, Sabine, and San Augustine counties.

(c) The Commissioners Court of San Augustine County may pay the county judge of San Augustine County additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2101. SAN JACINTO COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of San Jacinto County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in San Jacinto County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $3,000 nor more than $10,000, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of San Jacinto County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2111. SAN PATRICIO COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of San Patricio County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in San Patricio County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation may not be lower than the amount paid to the judges on September 1, 1981.

(c) The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of San Patricio County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 659, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2121. SAN SABA COUNTY. (a) The San Saba County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in San Saba County.

(b) The judge of the 33rd District Court is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $1,200 as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of San Saba County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 152.2131. SCHLEICHER COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Schleicher County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Schleicher County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not more than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Schleicher County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2141. SCURRY COUNTY. (a) Scurry County is included in the 132nd Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0231 applies to the 132nd Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2151. SHACKELFORD COUNTY. (a) The Shackelford County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Shackelford County, and the judge of any statutory court designated as the juvenile court. The juvenile court judge may appoint one public member for a term determined by the juvenile court judge.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the judges on the juvenile board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $2,500, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county. The public member serves without compensation.

(d) Section 152.0005(b) does not apply to the juvenile board of Shackelford County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2171. SHERMAN COUNTY. (a) The Sherman County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Sherman County, and the judge of any statutory court designated as a juvenile court.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(c) The board may cooperate with other juvenile boards to provide adequate services.

(d) The juvenile board members receive no compensation for serving on the board.

(e) Sections 152.0003 and 152.0005(b) do not apply to the juvenile board of Sherman County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2181. SMITH COUNTY. (a) The Smith County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Smith County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The county judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the board members annual additional compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court. The additional compensation is for the added duties imposed on the members and shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Smith County.

(e) The board may accept gifts and grants from any private or public source to use in maintaining and improving the county's juvenile probation services.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 376, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1005, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 152.2182. SMITH COUNTY CHILD SUPPORT OFFICE. (a) The Smith County Juvenile Board may establish a child support office in the district clerk's office to collect and disburse child support payments that are required by court order to be made to the county. The office shall receive and disburse the payments in the manner the court believes to be in the best interest of the parties in the case.

(b) The juvenile board may appoint an administrator and other necessary assistants to serve two-year terms. The administrator shall obtain a surety bond in an amount determined by the county auditor from a solvent surety company authorized to make the bonds in this state and approved by the county auditor. The bond shall be conditioned on the faithful performance of the administrator's duties and on the proper accounting of the money entrusted to the administrator. The county shall pay the premium for the bond from the general fund of the county, the child support fund, or any other available fund.

(c) The board shall determine the duties of the administrator and assistants and set their salaries. The salaries are payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county, the child support fund, or any other available fund. The board must approve a claim for expenses made by the administrator or an assistant or a claim for administrative expenses in operating the child support office, including a claim for payment of equipment and supplies.

(d) The office shall keep an accurate and complete record of money received and disbursed under this section. The county auditor or other authorized county officer or employee shall inspect and examine the records and audit the accounts quarterly. The record is open to the inspection by the public. The auditor shall report the results of the audit to the judges and include any recommendations the auditor may have.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2191. SOMERVELL COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Somervell County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Somervell County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary in an amount set by the commissioners court for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Somervell County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2201. STARR COUNTY. (a) The Starr County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the judge of the county court at law in Starr County, and the district judges in Starr County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 or more than $10,000 for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The juvenile board shall appoint not more than five persons to serve on an advisory council.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Starr County.

(f) The Starr County Juvenile Board and the juvenile boards of one or more counties that are adjacent to or in close proximity to Starr County may agree to operate together with respect to all matters, or with respect to certain matters specified by the juvenile boards. Juvenile boards operating together may appoint one fiscal officer to receive and disburse funds for the boards.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 908 (H.B. 2884), Sec. 36, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 705 (H.B. 2813), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 152.2221. STERLING COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Sterling County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Sterling County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not more than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Sterling County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2231. STONEWALL COUNTY. (a) Stonewall County is included in the 39th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.1101 applies to the 39th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 65 (S.B. 1811), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 152.2241. SUTTON COUNTY. (a) The Sutton County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Sutton County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $3,600 as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Sutton County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2251. SWISHER COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Castro and Swisher counties is composed of the county judges, the district judges in Castro and Swisher counties, and the judge of any statutory court designated as a juvenile court in the counties.

(b) Section 152.0411 applies to the juvenile board of Castro and Swisher counties.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 454, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Sec. 152.2261. TARRANT COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Tarrant County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Tarrant County.

(b) If the chief juvenile probation officer serves as secretary to the juvenile board, the officer may receive additional annual compensation of $1,000.

(c) The juvenile board shall hold meetings at least once every three months in accordance with board rules.

(d) The board shall keep records as required by law and board rules.

(e) A juvenile probation officer shall take the oath of office when appointed and the oath and the fact of the appointment shall be filed with the county clerk.

(f) The commissioners court shall provide the juvenile probation officers with:

(1) automobiles and their maintenance and operation expenses for use in official duties; or

(2) an automobile allowance for the use of a personal automobile on official business in the amount determined to be necessary by the juvenile board.

(g) The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation personnel and the additional compensation prescribed for the county judge.

(h) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Tarrant County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 152.2262. TARRANT COUNTY INSTITUTIONS. (a) The juvenile board of Tarrant County shall appoint a person to supervise the county facilities under the jurisdiction of the juvenile board. The supervisor may be the county probation officer. The supervisor shall direct the policies and conduct of each institution.

(b) The juvenile board shall also appoint the head of each facility. The facility head may hire employees that the juvenile board determines are necessary.

(c) The facilities supervisor or employees under the supervisor's control shall supervise each child committed to a county institution until the child becomes of age. The supervisor or employees shall submit periodic reports to the juvenile board as required for the board's approval or action.

(d) The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to operate each institution.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2263. COLLECTION AND DISBURSEMENT OF SUPPORT PAYMENTS IN TARRANT COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Tarrant County may designate the district clerk or the juvenile probation officer to collect and disburse court-ordered child or spousal support payments that are required by court order to be made to the county. The person designated to receive the payments shall disburse the payments in the manner the court believes to be in the best interest of the spouse or child.

(b) If the juvenile board designates the juvenile probation officer to receive the payments, the officer shall work in the court as an officer of the court. The officer shall obtain a surety bond in an amount determined by the commissioners court from a solvent surety company authorized to make the bonds in this state and approved by the commissioners court. The bond shall be conditioned on the faithful performance of the officer's duties and on the proper accounting of the money entrusted to the officer. The county shall pay the premium for the bond from the general fund of the county.

(c) The juvenile probation officer shall keep an accurate and complete record of money received and disbursed under this section. The record is open for public inspection. The county auditor shall inspect and examine the records and audit the accounts quarterly. The auditor shall report the results of the audit to the juvenile board and include any recommendations the auditor may have.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2264. TARRANT COUNTY CRIMINAL COURT ADMINISTRATOR. (a) Subject to the approval of the commissioners court, the judges of the district courts that give preference to criminal cases, the judges of the criminal district courts, and the judges of the county criminal courts of Tarrant County may use the services of a criminal courts administrator.

(b) A judge may not be subjected to a suit for, and is immune from liability for damages arising from, an act or omission committed while performing a duty under this section unless the act or omission is:

(1) committed intentionally, wilfully, or wantonly; or

(2) committed with:

(A) gross negligence;

(B) conscious indifference for the safety of others; or

(C) reckless disregard for the safety of others.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 14.002, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 152.2271. TAYLOR COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Taylor County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Taylor County, and the judge of each statutory county court exercising juvenile jurisdiction.

(b) The juvenile board shall hold meetings at least once every three months in accordance with board rules.

(c) The board shall keep records as required by law and board rules.

(d) A juvenile probation officer shall take the oath of office when appointed and the oath and the fact of the appointment shall be filed with the county clerk.

(e) The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation personnel.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Taylor County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 551, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2281. TERRELL COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Terrell County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Terrell County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $3,600, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Terrell County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2291. TERRY COUNTY. (a) The Terry County Juvenile Board is composed of the:

(1) county judge;

(2) district judges in Terry County;

(3) juvenile court judge;

(4) Brownfield city manager;

(5) superintendent of the Brownfield Independent School District; and

(6) one public member from Terry County appointed by the board chairman.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the judges on the juvenile board an annual salary of not more than $1,200 for the added duties imposed on them. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments out of the general fund of the county.

(d) If approved by the juvenile board, the commissioners court shall reimburse the juvenile board members and all probation officers and staff for reasonable and necessary job related expenses. Reimbursable expenses include travel, lodging, training, and educational activities.

(e) The commissioners court shall provide the funds for the salaries and allowances of the juvenile probation officers in the amount set by the juvenile board.

(f) Sections 152.0005(a) and (b) do not apply to the juvenile board of Terry County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2301. THROCKMORTON COUNTY. (a) Throckmorton County is included in the 39th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.1101 applies to the 39th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 65, Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2009.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 65, Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2009.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 65, Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2009.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 65 (S.B. 1811), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 65 (S.B. 1811), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 152.2311. TITUS COUNTY. (a) Titus County is included in the Camp, Marion, Morris, and Titus Counties Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0381 applies to the Camp, Marion, Morris, and Titus Counties Juvenile Board.

(c) Section 152.2312 is suspended while Titus County is a member of the Camp, Marion, Morris, and Titus Counties Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2312. TITUS COUNTY. (a) The Titus County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Titus County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $600 nor more than $1,800 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation officer.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the Titus County Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2321. TOM GREEN COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Tom Green County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Tom Green County.

(b) The juvenile board shall hold meetings at least once every three months in accordance with board rules.

(c) The county commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $600 or more than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The board shall keep records as required by law and board rules.

(e) A juvenile probation officer shall take the oath of office when appointed and the oath and the fact of the appointment shall be filed with the county clerk.

(f) The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation personnel.

(g) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Tom Green County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2331. TRAVIS COUNTY. (a) The Travis County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Travis County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members an annual salary of $4,800 for the judicial and administrative duties imposed on the judges. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) The commissioners court shall provide the funds for the salaries of the juvenile probation officers in the amount set by the juvenile board.

(d) The commissioners court shall pay the expenses of the juvenile probation officers that are certified as necessary by the juvenile board chairman from the general fund and in the amount set by the juvenile board.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, and 152.0007 do not apply to the juvenile board of Travis County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2332. COLLECTION AND DISBURSEMENT OF SUPPORT PAYMENTS IN TRAVIS COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Travis County may designate the chief probation officer to collect and disburse child and spousal support payments that are required by court order to be made to the county or that are voluntarily made to the county. The chief probation officer shall disburse the payments in the manner the court by order states is in the best interest of the spouse or child.

(b) The officer shall obtain a surety bond in an amount determined by the juvenile board from a corporate surety authorized to make the bonds in this state and approved by the commissioners court. The bond shall be payable to the district judges in the county and conditioned on the faithful performance of the officer's duties and on the proper accounting of the money entrusted to the officer. The county shall pay the premium for the bond from the general fund of the county.

(c) The officer shall keep an accurate and complete record of money received and disbursed under this section. The records are court records and may be inspected at reasonable times by the parties, their representatives, and attorneys. The records may be introduced into evidence as prescribed by the Texas Rules of Evidence. The county auditor shall inspect and examine the records and audit the accounts quarterly. The auditor shall report the results of the audit to the juvenile board and include any recommendations the auditor may have.

(d) The chief juvenile probation officer may appoint necessary personnel with the approval of the juvenile board to administer this section. The personnel serve at the pleasure of the chief juvenile probation officer.

(e) The commissioners court shall provide from the general fund the money necessary to administer this section in the amount recommended by the juvenile board and approved by the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2341. TRINITY COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Trinity County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Trinity County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $3,000 nor more than $10,000, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Trinity County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2351. TYLER COUNTY. (a) The Tyler County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Tyler County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not more than $5,000 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) The chairman shall certify all claims for expenses of the juvenile probation officer as necessary in the performance of the officer's duties. The commissioners court shall provide the necessary funds to pay the salaries and expenses of the juvenile probation officer.

(e) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Tyler County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2361. UPSHUR COUNTY. (a) The Upshur County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judge in Upshur County.

(b) The county judge of Upshur County is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 707, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

(d) Service on a juvenile board by a judge is an additional duty of office. The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from any funds available to the county or to the juvenile board.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 707, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 707, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 707, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

(h) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 707, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

(i) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 707, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

(j) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 707, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

(k) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 707, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

(l) The board may accept state aid and grants or gifts from other political subdivisions of the state, private citizens, or associations for the purpose of financing adequate and effective juvenile programs.

(m) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 707, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 707 (H.B. 3161), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 707 (H.B. 3161), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 152.2371. UPTON COUNTY. (a) The Upton County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Upton County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $3,600 as compensation for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Upton County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2381. UVALDE COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Uvalde County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Uvalde County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $3,600, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Uvalde County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2391. VAL VERDE COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Val Verde County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Val Verde County, and the judge of the County Court at Law of Val Verde County.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $3,600, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Val Verde County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1125 (H.B. 3952), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 152.2401. VAN ZANDT COUNTY. (a) The Van Zandt County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the criminal district attorney of Van Zandt County, the judge of the 294th Judicial District, and the judge of the county court at law.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at its first regular meeting of each calendar year.

(c) The board shall hold meetings each year on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(d) The board may agree to join with the juvenile board of one or more counties to provide services and facilities and to receive and disburse funds under this section.

(e) Service on a juvenile board by a judge or the district attorney is an additional duty of office. The commissioners courts shall pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners courts at not less than $600 for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly or bimonthly installments from any funds available to the county or to the juvenile board. The salary is in addition to all other compensation provided or allowed by law for criminal district attorneys.

(f) The juvenile board shall make the financial and statistical records and reports the board is required to make to the Texas Juvenile Justice Department available to the commissioners court.

(g) The board, in a timely manner, shall prepare and submit to the commissioners court for approval an annual request for funding for the board and the juvenile probation department. Each request must include the total of anticipated expenses of the board or for providing juvenile services for the next fiscal year. The request for funding for the juvenile probation department must also be accompanied by an accounting of all available funds from other funding sources.

(h) The board may accept aid, grants, and gifts from the state or federal government, other political subdivisions of the state, and associations to finance adequate and effective juvenile probation programs. The fiscal officer shall deposit funds received under this subsection in a special account.

(i) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, and 152.0008(a) do not apply to the juvenile board of Van Zandt County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1103 (H.B. 4833), Sec. 15(b), eff. January 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 130, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 152.2411. VICTORIA COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Victoria County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Victoria County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman of the board.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court. The additional compensation is for the added duties imposed on the members and shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) The commissioners court may pay the county clerk additional compensation for serving as the clerk of the juvenile court.

(e) The commissioners court shall provide the funds necessary to pay the salaries and expenses essential to the proper operation of the probation department.

(f) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, and 152.0005 do not apply to the juvenile board of Victoria County.

(g) The juvenile board of Victoria County and the juvenile boards of one or more counties that are adjacent to or in close proximity to Victoria County may agree to operate together with respect to all matters, or with respect to certain matters specified by the juvenile boards. Juvenile boards operating together may appoint one fiscal officer to receive and disburse funds for the boards.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 8.04, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 152.2421. WALKER COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Walker County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Walker County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation of not less than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Walker County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1152 (H.B. 3045), Sec. 4, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 152.2431. WALLER COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Waller County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Waller County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not more than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Waller County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 652, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2441. WARD COUNTY. (a) The Ward County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Ward County, and the judge of any statutory court in the county.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 or more than $3,600 for the added duties imposed on the members. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Ward County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2451. WASHINGTON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Washington County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Washington County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The board shall select one member to act as chairman.

(c) The commissioners court may reasonably compensate each member of the juvenile board for the member's additional duties.

(d) The juvenile board shall pay from the juvenile board fund to the extent of the state aid received in the fund the salaries of juvenile probation department personnel and other expenses required to provide adequate services to children.

(e) The county shall pay salaries and expenses other than those paid under Subsection (d) that are essential to provide adequate services to children in an amount set by the juvenile board with the advice and consent of the commissioners court.

(f) The juvenile board may accept state aid and grants or gifts from other political subdivisions of the state or associations for the sole purpose of financing adequate and effective probation programs. A municipality may grant money to the county government or to the juvenile board to support and maintain juvenile programs if the municipality's governing body approves the expenditure. Funds received under this subsection shall be administered and kept separately from other county funds.

(g) The chief juvenile probation officer may appoint necessary personnel with the approval of the juvenile board. Juvenile probation officers serve at the pleasure of the juvenile board.

(h) The juvenile board shall provide the juvenile probation officers with transportation or an automobile allowance for use of a personal automobile on official business.

(i) The juvenile board may agree to operate together with one or more counties that are adjacent to or in close proximity to Washington County. The juvenile boards operating together may appoint one fiscal officer to receive and disburse funds for the boards.

(j) The juvenile board may operate foster homes for the temporary care of children served by the board.

(k) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Washington County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 239, Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 1993.

Sec. 152.2461. WEBB COUNTY. (a) The Webb County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in the county, and the judge of each county court at law. The county judge may designate any member of the commissioners court to represent the judge on the board. A reference in this section to a juvenile court judge of a juvenile board member includes a person designated by the county judge under this subsection.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not more than $4,800 for the added duties imposed on the members. The compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) The commissioners court may reimburse the juvenile court judge for the judge's actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending seminars and other educational or instructional meetings relating to juvenile matters. The annual amount for which the judge may be reimbursed may not exceed $600.

(d) The juvenile board may require a board employee to enter into a bond payable to the board, conditioned on the faithful performance of the person's duties. The board shall pay the premium of the bond. The board may suspend or remove an employee for good cause. The board may permit the chief juvenile probation officer to suspend or remove employees whom the chief juvenile probation officer may supervise.

(e) The board shall control and supervise each county institution used to detain juveniles. The board shall appoint the superintendent of each institution.

(f) The board may accept gifts or grants of real or personal property subject to the terms and conditions of the gift or grant to use for the benefit of the juvenile justice system.

(g) The board shall submit an annual budget to the commissioners court. The commissioners court may appropriate and the juvenile board shall use money from the county general fund to administer this section.

(h) The board may authorize the use of foster homes for the temporary care of a child alleged to be a child in need of supervision or a delinquent child.

(i) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008(b) do not apply to the juvenile board of Webb County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 23, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 105, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 152.2471. WHARTON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Wharton County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Wharton County, and the judge of each county court at law.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the board members annual additional compensation in an amount set by the commissioners court. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Wharton County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2472. COMPENSATION OF JUVENILE JUDGE IN WHARTON COUNTY. (a) The Commissioners Court of Wharton County may pay the juvenile judge additional annual compensation of not more than $1,500 for serving as the judge of the juvenile court.

(b) The compensation is in addition to all other compensation paid or authorized to be paid to the judge who serves as the juvenile judge.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2473. WHARTON COUNTY CHILD SUPPORT OFFICE. (a) The judges of the district courts in Wharton County may establish a child support office in the county juvenile office to collect and disburse child support payments that are required by court order to be made to the office. The office shall disburse the payments in the manner the court believes to be in the best interest of the parties in the case.

(b) The judges of the district courts in a county served by an office may appoint an administrator and other assistants to serve two-year terms. The administrator shall obtain a surety bond in an amount determined by the county auditor from a solvent surety company authorized to make the bonds in this state and approved by the county auditor. The bond shall be conditioned on the faithful performance of the administrator's duties and on the proper accounting of the money entrusted to the administrator. The county shall pay the premium for the bond from the general fund of the county, the child support fund, or any other available fund.

(c) The judges shall determine the duties of the administrator and assistants and set their salaries. The salaries are payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county, the child support fund, or any other available fund. The judges must approve a claim for expenses made by the administrator or an assistant or a claim for administrative expenses in operating the child support office, including a claim for payment of equipment and supplies.

(d) The office shall keep an accurate and complete record of money received and disbursed under this section. The record is open for public inspection. The county auditor or other authorized county officer or employee shall inspect and examine the records and audit the accounts quarterly. The auditor shall report the results of the audit to the judges and include any recommendations the auditor may have.

(e) The child support office may serve one or more of Brazoria, Fort Bend, and Matagorda counties. If a child support office serves more than one county, the judges of the district courts in the counties shall determine the location of the office. The officers and employees of the county in which the office is located shall perform the duties prescribed by this section. The counties shall pay the salaries, bond premium, and other expenses in accordance with the ratio that the population of each county bears to the total population of all of the counties served by the office.

(f) The commissioners courts shall pay the district court judges $75 a month for performing the duties prescribed by this section. The compensation shall be paid from the general fund of the county and is in addition to any other compensation the judges receive.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2474. WHARTON COUNTY CHILD SUPPORT SERVICE FEE. (a) The Wharton County child support office shall assess a monthly fee of not more than $10 for collecting and disbursing child support payments that are required by court order to be made to the office. The fee is payable annually and in advance.

(b) The payor of the support shall pay the fee unless the payor is a member of the armed services and the monthly child support payments exceed the amount the court orders the person to pay, in which case the payee shall pay the service fee for as long as the payor is a member of the armed services and the support payments exceed the amount the court orders the person to pay.

(c) The first fee payment is due on the date that the payor is ordered to begin the child support payments. If the payee must pay the fee, the first fee payment is due on the date that the payee receives the original support payment. Subsequent annual fees are due on the anniversary of the date of the original fee payment.

(d) A person who refuses or fails to pay the fee on the date due or in the amount ordered is subject to an action for contempt of court.

(e) Fees collected under this section shall be paid to the county treasurer on the last day of each calendar month. The county treasurer shall deposit the fees to the credit of the child support fund. The judges of the district courts in a county served by the office shall administer the fund, with the approval of the commissioners court, to assist in paying the salaries and expenses of the child support office.

(f) An accurate and complete record of money received under this section shall be kept. The county auditor or other authorized person shall audit the child support fund regularly. An annual report of the receipts and expenditures of the fund shall be made to the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 12.04(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 152.2491. WICHITA COUNTY. (a) The Wichita County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Wichita County, and the judge of each statutory county court.

(b) The commissioners court may pay the board members additional annual compensation in an amount determined by the commissioners court, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) The juvenile board may authorize the use of foster homes for the temporary care of children subject to Title 3 or 5, Family Code. The rate of pay for foster care shall be determined by the juvenile board and those payments are necessary operating expenses of the Wichita County Family Court Services Department.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Wichita County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 7.52, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 152.2492. WICHITA COUNTY INSTITUTIONS. (a) The juvenile board of Wichita County controls and supervises each county facility used for the detention of juveniles.

(b) The chief juvenile probation officer shall appoint the superintendent of each facility. The juvenile board must confirm the appointment. A superintendent or an assistant may be suspended or removed at any time by the appointing authority.

(c) The juvenile board shall set the salaries of the superintendents and assistants.

(d) This section does not apply to a person or facility that provides services to juveniles under a contract with the commissioners court or juvenile board and that is licensed or registered by a state or federal agency or an agency of another state.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 288 (H.B. 953), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 152.2501. WILBARGER COUNTY. (a) Wilbarger County is included in the 46th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

(b) Section 152.0841 applies to the 46th Judicial District Juvenile Board.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2511. WILLACY COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Willacy County is composed of the judges of the county and district courts in the county. The board must have not fewer than three nor more than five members. The judges of the county and district courts in the county may appoint an appropriate number of public members to serve on the board without compensation if necessary to satisfy this requirement. The chairman of the board shall determine the number of public members to be appointed to the board.

(b) The county judge is the chairman of the board.

(c) The board shall hold biannual meetings on dates set by the board and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(d) Service on a juvenile board by a judge is an additional duty of office. The commissioners court shall pay the judges on the juvenile board an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $6,000, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(e) The county shall reimburse a juvenile board member for the member's actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing the member's duties.

(f) The juvenile board shall ensure that the chief juvenile officer and fiscal officer:

(1) keep the financial and statistical records and submit reports to the Texas Juvenile Justice Department as prescribed by Section 221.007; and

(2) submit periodic financial and statistical reports to the county commissioners court.

(g) The chief juvenile probation officer shall appoint an appropriate number of qualified juvenile probation officers, assistants, and support personnel with the approval of the board as necessary to perform his duties. The chief juvenile probation officer and the personnel appointed under this section may be removed at any time by the appointing authority or by the juvenile board. The chief juvenile probation officer shall recommend to the juvenile board the salaries of and allowances for juvenile probation officers, assistants, and support personnel. The juvenile board shall provide the chief juvenile probation officer and his assistants with transportation or an automobile allowance for use of a personal automobile on official business.

(h) A claim for expenses from a person in the juvenile probation department must be made to the board chairman. The chairman shall certify to the fiscal officer the expenses to be paid from state funds and shall certify to the commissioners court the expenses to be paid from county funds.

(i) The chairman of the board shall certify to the commissioners court an annual request for the expenditure of county funds. The commissioners court shall act on the request in the same manner as it acts on a request from another county office.

(j) The board may accept state aid and grants and gifts from other political subdivisions of the state or associations for the purpose of financing adequate and effective juvenile programs. A municipality may grant and allocate money to the juvenile board to support and maintain effective juvenile services if the municipality's governing body approves the expenditure. Funds received under this subsection shall be administered and kept separately from other public funds. This section does not affect a program of local enrichment of juvenile services funded by a service.

(k) The juvenile board shall appoint an advisory council of not more than five persons.

(l) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0008, and 152.0009 do not apply to the juvenile board of Willacy County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 3.022, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 152.2521. WILLIAMSON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Williamson County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in the county, and the judges of any statutory court in the county designated as a juvenile court. The judge of a district court may designate a person to represent the judge on the board.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members to act as chairman.

(c) The board may cooperate with other juvenile boards to provide adequate services.

(d) The board's fiscal officer shall receive and disburse for juvenile probation the funds of the board.

(e) Service on a juvenile board by a judge is an additional duty of office. The commissioners court may pay the juvenile board members a salary in an amount that will reasonably compensate them for their added duties. The commissioners court shall pay to a person designated to serve on the board by a district judge the judge's salary as authorized by this subsection. The salary to the person designated is in addition to all other compensation provided or allowed by law.

(f) The county shall reimburse a juvenile board member for the member's actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing his duties.

(g) The juvenile board shall provide each juvenile probation officer with an automobile or an automobile allowance for use of a personal automobile on official business.

(h) The juvenile board shall pay the salaries of juvenile probation personnel and other expenses required to provide adequate services to children from the juvenile board fund to the extent of the state aid received in the fund. The county shall pay the other salaries and expenses essential to provide adequate services in an amount set by the juvenile board with the advice and consent of the commissioners court.

(i) The board may accept state aid and grants or gifts from other political subdivisions of the state or associations for the sole purpose of financing adequate and effective juvenile programs. A municipality may grant and allocate money to the appropriate county government or to the juvenile board to support and maintain effective juvenile services if the municipality's governing body approves the expenditure. Funds received under this subsection shall be administered and kept separately from other public funds. This section does not affect a program of local enrichment of juvenile services funded by any source.

(j) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0008, and 152.0009 do not apply to the juvenile board of Williamson County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2531. WILSON COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Wilson County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Wilson County.

(b) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members additional annual compensation set by the commissioners court at not less than $1,200 nor more than $4,800 for the added duties imposed on the members. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

(c) Sections 152.0002, 152.0003, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Wilson County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2541. WINKLER COUNTY. (a) The Winkler County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Winkler County.

(b) The juvenile court judge is the chairman of the board and its chief administrative officer.

(c) The commissioners court may pay the board chairman additional annual compensation of $1,200 for the added duties imposed on the chairman. The commissioners court may pay the other members of the board additional annual compensation of not more than $1,200. The additional compensation shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0006, 152.0007, and 152.0008 do not apply to the juvenile board of Winkler County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2551. WISE COUNTY. (a) Wise County is included in the juvenile board in Jack and Wise counties.

(b) Section 152.1251 applies to the juvenile board in Jack and Wise counties.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 152.2561. WOOD COUNTY. (a) The juvenile board of Wood County is composed of the county judge, the district judges in the county, and the judge of any statutory court in the county designated as a juvenile court.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at its first regular meeting of each calendar year.

(c) The board may agree to operate with the juvenile board of another county to provide services and to receive and disburse funds.

(d) The board shall hold regular meetings each year on dates set by the board, and special meetings at the call of the chairman.

(e) Service on a juvenile board by a judge is an additional duty of office. The commissioners court shall pay each juvenile board member an annual salary of not less than $4,800, payable in equal monthly installments from any funds available to the county or to the juvenile board.

(f) The commissioners court shall reimburse a juvenile board member for the member's actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing the member's duties. The commissioners court shall set the rate of reimbursement and shall pay the expenses from funds allocated or received from any source.

(g) The juvenile board shall appoint necessary juvenile probation department personnel. The juvenile board may discharge the employees of the juvenile probation department.

(h) The juvenile board shall provide each juvenile probation officer or juvenile probation department employee with an automobile or an automobile allowance for use of a personal automobile on official business.

(i) The juvenile board shall pay the salaries, allowances, and other necessary expenses from the juvenile probation budget to the extent of the state aid received. The commissioners court shall pay the remaining salaries, allowances, and other necessary expenses from the general fund or other available funds of the county.

(j) The juvenile board shall set the annual rate of increase in the salaries of juvenile probation department personnel. If any portion of an employee's salary is to be paid from the general fund, the commissioners court shall approve the salary as presented to the commissioners court by the chairman of the juvenile board. For purposes of this subsection, "salary" means only the fixed compensation paid to an employee and does not include health insurance, allowances, or any other benefit.

(k) The board may accept state aid and grants or gifts from other political subdivisions of the state or associations for the sole purpose of financing adequate and effective juvenile programs. The fiscal officer shall deposit funds received under this subsection in a special account.

(l) The board shall make available to the commissioners court the financial and statistical reports required by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department.

(m) Sections 152.0002, 152.0004, 152.0005, 152.0008, and 152.0009 do not apply to the juvenile board of Wood County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 131, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 152.2571. YOAKUM COUNTY. (a) The Yoakum County Juvenile Board is composed of the county judge, the district judges in Yoakum County, and the judge of any statutory court in the county designated as a juvenile court.

(b) The juvenile board shall elect one of its members as chairman at the beginning of each year.

(c) The commissioners court shall pay the juvenile board members an annual salary set by the commissioners court at not more than $1,200, payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund or any other available fund of the county.

(d) Section 152.0005(b) does not apply to the juvenile board of Yoakum County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 352, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.